<doc><docno>1000</docno>




Hercule Poirot
1000

243685651
2008-10-07T16:45:26Z

Lightmouse
4469495



Hercule Poirot characters
Fictional private investigators
Hercule Poirot
Series of books




Infobox character





Private Dectective
   Former Retired Detective   Former Police 
officer







Curtain




''




David Suchet




Peter Ustinov




Albert Finney


See below


Police Officer





Agatha Christie





Roman Catholic




DEDEE2





Belgian


Hercule Poirot

Male







The Mysterious Affair at Styles




''




 Poirot  redirects here. For the TV series, see 

Agatha Christie's Poirot
.


Hercule Poirot (pronounced  in 

French
) is a 
fictional 

Belgian
 
detective created by 



Agatha Christie


. Along with 

Miss Marple
, Poirot is one of Christie's most famous and long-lived characters: he appeared in  33 novels and 51 short stories.   


Poirot has been portrayed on screen, for films and TV, by various actors including 


Albert Finney

, 


Peter Ustinov

, 


Ian Holm

, 

Tony Randall
, 

Alfred Molina
, and 


David Suchet

.



Overview



Influences


His name was derived from two other fictional detectives of the time: 
Marie Belloc Lowndes' Hercule Popeau and 
Frank Howel Evans' Monsieur Poiret, a retired French police officer living in London.1 A more obvious influence on the early Poirot stories is that of 



Arthur Conan Doyle


. In An Autobiography Christie admits that  I was still writing in the 

Sherlock Holmes
 tradition   eccentric detective, stooge assistant, with a 










Lestrade









-type Scotland Yard detective, Inspector Japp. 2  For his part Conan Doyle acknowledged basing Sherlock Holmes on the model of 



Edgar Allan Poe


's fictional French detective 








C. Auguste Dupin







, who in his use of  ratiocination  prefigures Poirot's reliance on his  little grey cells .3


Poirot also bears a striking resemblance to 










A. E. W. Mason









's fictional detective   Inspector Hanaud of the French Surete-who, first appearing in the 1910 novel At the Villa Rose, predates the writing of the first Poirot novel by six years.   In chapter 4 of the second Inspector Hanaud novel, The House of the Arrow (1924), Hanaud declares sanctimoniously to the heroine,  You are wise, Mademoiselle  For, after all, I am Hanaud. There is only one. 


Christie's Poirot was 
Belgian. Unlike the models mentioned above, Christie's Poirot character was clearly the result of her early development of the detective in her first book written in 1916 (though only published in 1920). Not only was his Belgian nationality interesting because of Belgium's occupation by Germany (which provided a valid explanation of why such a skilled detective would be out of work and available to solve mysteries at an English country house),, but also at the time of Christie's writing, it was considered patriotic to express sympathy with the Belgians   since the invasion of their country had constituted Britain's 
casus belli for entering 

World War I
, and British wartime propaganda emphasized and exagerated the  







Rape of Belgium






 .




Popularity


His first published appearance was in 





The Mysterious Affair at Styles




 (published 1920) and his last was in 





Curtain''




 (published 1975, the year before Christie died). On publication of this novel, Poirot was the only fictional character to be given an obituary in the 
New York Times; August 6, 1975  Hercule Poirot is Dead; Famed Belgian Detective .4


By 1930, Agatha Christie found Poirot 'insufferable' and by 1960,  she felt that he was a 'detestable, bombastic, tiresome, ego-centric little creep'. Yet the public loved him, and Christie refused to kill him off, claiming that it was her duty to produce what the public liked, and what the public liked was Poirot.5




Appearance and personal attributes


Here is how 
Captain Arthur Hastings first describes Poirot:


 He was hardly more than five feet four inches but carried himself with great dignity. His head was exactly the shape of an egg, and he always perched it a little on one side. His moustache was very stiff and military. Even if everything on his face was covered, the tips of moustache and the pink-tipped nose would be visible. 




 The neatness of his attire was almost incredible; I believe a speck of dust would have caused him more pain than a bullet wound. Yet this quaint dandified little man who, I was sorry to see, now limped badly, had been in his time one of the most celebrated members of the Belgian police. 6


This is how Agatha Christie describes Poirot in The Murder on the Orient Express in the very initial pages:




  By the step leading up into the sleeping-car stood a young French lieutenant, resplendent in uniform conversing, with a small lean man (Hercule Poirot) muffled up to the ears of whom nothing was visible but a pink-tipped nose and the two points of an upward-curled moustache. 


In the later books, the limp is not mentioned. Poirot has dark hair, which he dyes later in life7 and green eyes that are repeatedly described as shining  like a cat's  when he is struck by a clever idea.8 Frequent mention is made of his patent-leather shoes, damage to which is frequently a subject of (for the reader, comical) misery on his part.9 Poirot's appearance, regarded as fastidious during his early career, is hopelessly out of fashion later in his career.10




 The plane dropped slightly.  Mon estomac,  thought Hercule Poirot, and closed his eyes determinedly. 11


Among Poirot's most significant personal attributes is the sensitivity of his stomach. He suffers from sea sickness,12 and in Death in the Clouds believes that his air sickness prevents him from being more alert at the time of the murder. Later in his life, we are told:


  Always a man who had taken his stomach seriously, he was reaping his reward in old age. Eating was not only a physical pleasure, it was also an intellectual research. 13


Poirot is extremely punctual and carries a 
turnip pocket watch almost to the end of his career.14 He is also fastidious about his personal finances, preferring to keep a bank balance of 444 pounds, 4 shillings, and 4 pence (The Lost Mine).




Methods



In The Mysterious Affair at Styles, Poirot operates as a fairly conventional, clue-based detective, depending on logic, which is represented in his vocabulary by two common phrases: his use of  
the little grey cells  and  order and method . Irritating to Hastings is the fact that Poirot will sometimes conceal from him important details of his plans, as in 





The Big Four''




 where Hastings is kept in the dark throughout the climax. This aspect of Poirot is less evident in the later novels, partly because there is rarely a 
narrator so there is no one for Poirot to mislead.


As early as Murder on the Links, where he still largely depends on clues, Poirot mocks a rival detective who focuses on the traditional trail of clues that had been established in detective fiction by the example of Sherlock Holmes: footprints, fingerprints and cigar ash. From this point on he establishes himself as a psychological detective who proceeds not by a painstaking examination of the crime scene, but by enquiring either into the nature of the victim or the murderer. Central to his behaviour in the later novels is the underlying assumption that particular crimes are only committed by particular types of person.


Poirot's methods focus on getting people to talk. Early in the novels, he frequently casts himself in the role of  Papa Poirot , a benign confessor, especially to young women. Later he lies freely in order to gain the confidences of other characters, either inventing his own reason for being interested in the case15 or a family excuse16 for pursuing a line of questioning. 


 To this day Harold is not quite sure what made him suddenly pour out the whole story to a little man to whom he had only spoken a few minutes before. 17

Poirot is also willing to appear more foreign or vain than he really is in an effort to make people underestimate him. He admits as much:


  It is true that I can speak the exact, the idiomatic English. But, my friend, to speak the broken English is an enormous asset. It leads people to despise you. They say   a foreigner   he can't even speak English properly. [ ] Also I boast! An Englishman he says often,  A fellow who thinks as much of himself as that cannot be worth much. [ ] And so, you see, I put people off their guard. 18


In the later novels Christie often uses the word mountebank when Poirot is being assessed by other characters, showing that he has successfully passed himself off as a 
charlatan or fraud.


All these techniques help Poirot attain his principal target:  For in the long run, either through a lie, or through truth, people were bound to give themselves away   19





 Recurring characters 



Arthur Hastings





Main article: 
 Captain Arthur Hastings

Hastings first meets Poirot during his years as a private detective in Europe and almost immediately after they both arrive in England, becomes his life-long partner and appears in many of the novels and stories. Poirot regarded Hastings as a poor private detective, not particularly intelligent, yet helpful in his way of being fooled by the criminal and for his tendency to unknowingly  stumble  onto the truth.20 He is married and has a daughter.


It must also be said that Hastings was a man who was capable of great bravery and courage when the road got rough, facing death unflinchingly when confronted by 





The Big Four''




 and possessing unwavering loyalty towards Poirot. However, when forced to choose between Poirot and his wife in that novel, he initially chose to betray Poirot to the Big Four so that they would not torture and kill his wife. Later, though, he told Poirot to draw back and escape the trap.


The two were an airtight team until Hastings met and married Dulcie Duveen, a beautiful music hall performer half his age, which was not objectionable in the late Victorian, Edwardian world. They later emigrated to Argentina leaving Poirot behind as a  very unhappy old man.   Poirot and Hastings are at last reunited in Curtain: Poirot's Last Case. They are also reunited in  The ABC Murders 
when Hastings arrives in England for business.




Ariadne Oliver





Main article: 

Ariadne Oliver


The frequently recurring detective novelist Ariadne Oliver is Agatha Christie's humorous self-caricature. Like Agatha Christie, she isn't overly fond of the detective she is most famous for creating   in Ariadne's case the 

Finnish
 sleuth 












Sven Hjerson











. We never learn anything about her husband, but we do know that she hates alcohol and public appearances, and has a great fondness for apples until she is put off them by the events of 





Hallowe'en Party




. She also has a habit of constantly changing her hairstyle and in every appearance by her much is made of the clothes and hats she wears. She has a maid called Maria who prevents the public adoration from becoming too much of a burden on her employer, but does nothing to prevent her from becoming too much of a burden on others.


She has authored over fifty-six novels and she has a great dislike of people taking and modifying her story characters. She is also the only one in Poirot's universe to have noted that  It s not natural for five or six people to be on the spot when B is murdered and all have a motive for killing B.  She first met Poirot in the story Cards on the Table and has been bothering him ever since.




Miss Lemon


Poirot's secretary, Miss Felicity Lemon, has few human weaknesses. The only two mistakes she is ever recorded making are a typing error during the events of Hickory Dickory Dock and the mis-mailing of an electric bill, although in her defence she was worried about strange events surrounding her sister at the time. Poirot described her as being  Unbelievably ugly and incredibly efficient. Anything that she mentioned as worth consideration usually was worth consideration.  She is an expert on nearly everything and plans to create the perfect filing system. She also once worked for the government agent-turned-philanthropist, 










Parker Pyne









. Whether this was during one of Poirot s numerous retirements or before she entered his employment is unknown.




Chief Inspector Japp





Main article: 










Chief Inspector Japp











Japp is an Inspector from 



Scotland Yard


 and appears in many of the stories, trying to solve the cases Poirot is working on. Japp is an outgoing, loud and sometimes inconsiderate man by nature and his relationship with the bourgeois Belgian is one of the stranger aspects of Poirot s world. He first met Poirot in Belgium, 1904, during the Abercrombie Forgery and later that year joined forces again to hunt down a criminal known as Baron Altara. They also meet in England where Poirot often helps Japp solve a case and lets him take the credit in return for special favours. These favours usually entail being supplied with cases that would interest him.21




George


George (we are never told his last name) is a classic English valet and first entered Poirot s employ in 1923 and didn t leave his side until the 1970s, shortly before Poirot s death. A competent, matter-of-fact man with an extensive knowledge of the English aristocracy and absolutely no imagination, George provides a steady contrast to Hastings.





 Hercule Poirot's life 



Family and childhood  

 


 I suppose you know pretty well everything there is to know about Poirot's family by this time .22


It is difficult to draw any concrete conclusions about Poirot's family, due to the fact that Poirot often supplies false or misleading information about himself or his background in order to assist him in obtaining information relevant to a particular case. 


In chapter 21 of The Murder of Roger Ackroyd, for example, we learn that he has been talking about a mentally disabled nephew: this proves to be a ruse so that he can find out about homes for the mentally unfit   but that does not mean that Poirot does not have such a nephew. 


In Dumb Witness, he regales us with stories of his elderly invalid mother as a pretence to investigate the local nurses. In The Big Four Hastings believes that he meets Achille Poirot who (in an apparent 
parody of 










Mycroft Holmes









) is evidently his smarter brother. On this occasion, Achille is almost certainly Poirot himself in disguise (Poirot speaks in Chapter 18 of having sent Achille  back to the land of myths ), but this does not conclusively demonstrate that Poirot does not have a brother, or even a brother called Achille. 


Any evidence regarding Poirot for which Poirot himself is the source is therefore most unreliable. Achille Poirot is also mentioned by Dr. Burton in the prelude to The Labours of Hercules. Here Hercule Poirot replies that he has had a brother called Achille  only for a space period of time , so the existence of this brother remains unconfirmed even by Hercule Poirot himself.23


Poirot was apparently born in 

Spa, Belgium
 and, based on the conjecture that he was thirty at the time of his retirement from the Belgian police force at the time of the outbreak of the First World War, it is suggested that he was born in the mid 1880s. 


This is all extremely vague, as Poirot is thought to be an old man in his dotage even in the early Poirot novels, and in An Autobiography Christie admitted that she already imagined him to be an old man in 1920. (At the time, of course, she had no idea she would be going on writing Poirot books for many decades to come.) Much of the suggested dating for Poirot's age is therefore post-rationalisation on the part of those attempting to make sense of his extraordinarily long career.


Poirot is a Roman Catholic by birth,24 and retains a strong sense of Catholic morality later in life.25 Not much is known of Poirot s childhood other than he once claimed in Three Act Tragedy to have been from a large family with little wealth. In Taken at the Flood, he further claimed to have been raised and educated by nuns, raising the possibility that he (and any siblings) were orphaned.




Poirot s police years




 Gustave [ ] was not a policeman. I have dealt with policemen all my life and I know. He could pass as a detective to an outsider but not to a man who was a policeman himself.    Hercule Poirot in  The Erymanthian Boar  (1940). 


As an adult, Poirot joined the Belgian police force. Very little mention is made in Christie's work about this part of his life, but in  The Nemean Lion  (1939) Poirot himself refers to a Belgian case of his in which  a wealthy soap manufacturer [ ] poisoned his wife in order to be free to marry his secretary . We do not know whether this case resulted in a successful prosecution or not; moreover, Poirot is not above lying in order to produce a particular effect in the person to whom he is speaking, so this evidence is not reliable.


Inspector Japp gives some insight into Poirot's career with the Belgian police when introducing him to a colleague:


 You've heard me speak of Mr Poirot? It was in 1904 he and I worked together   the Abercrombie forgery case   you remember he was run down in Brussels. Ah, those were the days Moosier. Then, do you remember  Baron  Altara? There was a pretty rogue for you! He eluded the clutches of half the police in Europe. But we nailed him in Antwerp   thanks to Mr. Poirot here. 26

Perhaps this is enough evidence to suggest that Poirot's police career was a successful one. 


In the short story The Chocolate Box (1923) Poirot provides 
Captain Arthur Hastings with an account of what he considers to be his only failure. Poirot admits that he has failed to solve a crime  innumerable  times:


 I have been called in too late. Very often another, working towards the same goal, has arrived there first. Twice I have been struck down with illness just as I was on the point of success. 

Nevertheless, he regards the case in  The Chocolate Box , which took place in 1893,27 as his only actual failure of detection. Again, Poirot is not reliable as a narrator of his personal history and there is no evidence that Christie sketched it out in any depth.


It was also in this period that Poirot shot a man who was firing from a roof onto the public below.28


Poirot had retired from the Belgian police force by the time he met Hastings in 1916 on the case retold in The Mysterious Affair at Styles.


It should be noted that Poirot is a French-speaking Belgian, i.e. a 



Walloon


; but there can hardly be found any occasion where he refers to himself as such, or is so referred to by others. At the time of writing, at least of the earlier books where the character was defined, non-Belgians such as Agatha Christie were far less aware than nowadays of the deep linguistic divide in Belgian society, assuming that all Belgians were French-speaking.




 Career as a private detective 




  I had called in at my friend Poirot's rooms to find him sadly overworked. So much had he become the rage that every rich woman who had mislaid a bracelet or lost a pet kitten rushed to secure the services of the great Hercule Poirot. 29During World War I, Poirot left Belgium for Britain as a 
refugee. It was here, on 16 July 1916, that he again met his lifelong friend, Captain Arthur Hastings, and solved the first of his cases to be published: The Mysterious Affair at Styles.30 After that case Poirot apparently came to the attention of the British secret service, and undertook cases for the British government, including foiling the attempted abduction of the Prime Minister.31


After the war Poirot became a free agent and began undertaking civilian cases.  He moved into what became both his home and work address, 56B Whitehaven Mansions, 
Sandhurst Square, 

London
 W1.32 It was chosen by Poirot for its symmetry. His first case was  The Affair at the Victory Ball , which saw Poirot enter the high society and begin his career as a 
private detective.


Between the world wars, Poirot traveled all over Europe and the Middle East investigating crimes and murders. Most of his cases happened during this period and he was at the height of his powers at this point in his life. The Murder On the Links saw the Belgian pit his grey cells against a French murderer. In the Middle East he solved the cases of Death on the Nile, and Murder in Mesopotamia with ease and even survived An Appointment with Death. As he passed through 


Eastern Europe

 on his return trip, he solved The Murder on the Orient Express. However he did not travel to the Americas or Australia, probably due to his sea sickness. 


 It is this villainous sea that troubles me! The mal de mer   it is horrible suffering! 33


It was during this time he met the Countess Vera Rossakoff, a glamorous jewel thief. The history of the Countess is, like Poirot's, steeped in mystery. She claims to have been a member of the Russian aristocracy before the Russian Revolution and suffered greatly as a result, but how much of that story is true is an open question. Even Poirot acknowledges that Rossakoff has told several wildly varying accounts of her early life. Poirot later became smitten with the woman and allowed her to escape justice.


 It is the misfortune of small, precise men always to hanker after large and flamboyant women.  Poirot had never been able to rid himself of the fatal fascination that the Countess held for him. 34


Although letting the Countess escape may be morally questionable, that impulse to take the law into his own hands was far from unique. In The Nemean Lion, he sided with the criminal, Miss Amy Carnaby, and saved her from having to face justice by blackmailing his client Sir Joseph Hoggins, who himself was plotting murder and was unwise enough to let Poirot discover this. Poirot even sent Miss Carnaby two hundred pounds as a final payoff before her dog kidnapping campaign came to an end. In The Murder of Roger Ackroyd he allowed the murderer to escape justice through suicide and then ensured the truth was never known to spare the feelings of the murderer's relatives. In The Augean Stables he helped the government to cover up vast corruption, even though it might be considered more honest to let the truth come out.  


After his cases in the Middle East, Poirot returned to Britain. Apart from some of the so-called  Labours of Hercules  (see next section) he very rarely traveled abroad during his later career.




 Retirement 




 That s the way of it. Just a case or two, just one case more   the Prima Donna s farewell performance won t be in it with yours, Poirot. 35




Poirot's last cases as a private detective



There is a great deal of confusion about Poirot's retirement. Most of the cases covered by Poirot's private detective agency take place before his retirement to grow 











marrows










, at which time he solves 





The Murder of Roger Ackroyd




. It has been said that twelve cases related in The Labours of Hercules (1947) must refer to a different retirement, but the fact that Poirot specifically says that he intends to grow marrows indicates that these stories also take place before Roger Ackroyd, and presumably Poirot closed his agency once he had completed them. There is specific mention in  The Capture of Cerberus  to the fact that there has been a gap of twenty years between Poirot's previous meeting with Countess Rossakoff and this one. If the Labours precede the events in Roger Ackroyd, then the Roger Ackroyd case must have taken place around twenty years later than it was published, and so must any of the cases that refer to it.  One alternative would be that having failed to grow marrows once, Poirot is determined to have another go, but this is specifically denied by Poirot himself.36 Another alternative would be to suggest that the Preface to the Labours takes place at one date but that the labours are completed over a matter of twenty years. None of the explanations is especially attractive.


In terms of a rudimentary chronology, Poirot speaks of retiring to grow marrows in Chapter 18 of The Big Four (1927), which places that novel out of published order before Roger Ackroyd. He declines to solve a case for the Home Secretary because he is retired in Chapter One of Peril at End House (1932). He is certainly retired at the time of Three Act Tragedy (1935) but he does not enjoy his retirement and comes repeatedly out of it thereafter when his curiosity is engaged. Nevertheless, he continues to employ his secretary, Miss Lemon, at the time of the cases retold in Hickory Dickory Dock and Dead Man's Folly, which take place in the mid-1950s. It is therefore better to assume that Christie provided no authoritative chronology for Poirot's retirement, but assumed that he could either be an active detective, a consulting detective or a retired detective as the needs of the immediate case required.


One thing that is consistent about Poirot's retirement is that his fame declines during it, so that in the later novels he is often disappointed when characters (especially younger characters) do not recognise either him or his name:


 I should, perhaps, Madame, tell you a little more about myself. I am Hercule Poirot. 

: The revelation left Mrs Summerhayes unmoved.


  What a lovely name,  she said kindly.  Greek, isn't it? 37






Post World War II 




 He, I knew, was not likely to be far from his headquarters. The time when cases had drawn him from one end of England to the other was past. 38


Poirot is less active during the cases that take place at the end of his career. Beginning with Three Act Tragedy (1934), Christie had perfected during the inter-war years a sub-genre of Poirot novel in which the detective himself spent much of the first third of the novel on the periphery of events. In novels such as Taken at the Flood, After the Funeral and Hickory Dickory Dock he is even less in evidence, frequently passing the duties of main interviewing detective to a subsidiary character. In Cat Among the Pigeons Poirot's entrance is so late as to be almost an afterthought. Whether this was a reflection of his age or of the fact that Christie was by now heartily sick of him it is difficult to assess. There is certainly a case for saying that 





Crooked House




 (1949) and 





Ordeal by Innocence




 (1957), which are not Poirot novels at all but so easily could have been, represent a logical endpoint of the general diminution of Poirot himself within the Poirot sequence.


Towards the end of his career it becomes clear that Poirot's retirement is no longer a convenient fiction. He assumes a genuinely inactive lifestyle during which he concerns himself with studying famous unsolved cases of the past and reading detective novels. He even writes a book about mystery fiction in which he deals sternly with 



Edgar Allan Poe


 and 













Wilkie Collins












.39 In the absence of a more appropriate puzzle, he solves such inconsequential domestic problems as the presence of three pieces of orange peel in his umbrella stand.40


Poirot (and, it is reasonable to suppose, his creator)41 becomes increasingly bemused by the vulgarism of the up and coming generation's young people. In Hickory Dickory Dock, he investigates the strange goings on in a student hostel, while in the Third Girl he is forced into contact with the smart set of Chelsea youths. In the growing drug and pop culture of the sixties, he proves himself once again, but has become heavily reliant on other investigators (especially the private investigator, Mr. Goby) who provide him with the clues that he can no longer gather for himself.


  You're too old. Nobody told me you were so old. I really don't want to be rude but   there it is. You're too old. I'm really very sorry. 42






 Death 


Poirot dies from complications of a heart condition at the end of Curtain: Poirot's Last Case, where he moves his 
amyl nitrate pills out of his reach. It is revealed at the end of Curtain that he fakes his need for a wheelchair (he wants to fool people into believing that he is suffering from 
arthritis).





Major novels



The Poirot books take readers through the whole of his life in England, from the first book (





The Mysterious Affair at Styles




), where he is a refugee staying at Styles, to the last Poirot book (





Curtain




), where he visits Styles once again before his death. In between, Poirot solves cases outside England as well, including his most famous case, 





Murder on the Orient Express




 (1934).


Hercule Poirot became famous with the publication, in 1926, of 





The Murder of Roger Ackroyd




, whose surprising solution proved controversial. The novel is still among the most famous of all detective novels: 


















Edmund Wilson

















 alludes to it in the title of his well-known attack on detective fiction,  Who Cares Who Killed Roger Ackroyd?   Aside from Roger Ackroyd, the most critically-acclaimed Poirot novels appeared from 1932 to 1942, including such acknowledged classics as 





Murder on the Orient Express




, 
The ABC Murders (1935), 







Cards on the Table






 (1936), and 





Death on the Nile




 (1937).  The last of these, a tale of multiple homicide upon a Nile steamer, was judged by the celebrated detective novelist 






John Dickson Carr





 to be among the ten greatest mystery novels of all time.


The 1942 novel 





Five Little Pigs




 (aka Murder in Retrospect), in which Poirot investigates a murder committed sixteen years before by analyzing various accounts of the tragedy, is a 
Rashomon-like performance that critic and mystery novelist 





Robert Barnard




 called the best of the Christie novels.


For a list of novels and short stories featuring Hercule Poirot, please see 
Hercule Poirot in literature.




Portrayals



Film



Austin Trevor


Austin Trevor debuted the role of Poirot on film in the 1931 movie Alibi. The film was based on the stage play 

Alibi
 which had been adapted by 






Michael Morton





 from the 
novel 





The Murder of Roger Ackroyd




. 


Trevor reprised the role of Poirot twice, in Black Coffee and 





Lord Edgware Dies




. Trevor said once that he was probably cast as Poirot simply because he could do a French accent.43




Albert Finney






Albert Finney

 played Poirot in 1974 in the cinematic version of 

Murder on the Orient Express
. His portrayal was considered by many to be the definitive Poirot until 


David Suchet

 took up the role. It was a very faithful adaptation of 





the novel




 and was, at the time, the most successful British film ever made. It received the stamp of approval from Agatha Christie herself. Finney is, so far, the only actor to receive an 

Academy Award
 nomination for playing Poirot, though he did not win.




Peter Ustinov





Peter Ustinov as Poirot in Evil Under the Sun''






Peter Ustinov

 played Poirot a total of six times, starting with 

Death on the Nile
 (1978). He reprised the role in 

Evil Under the Sun
 (1982) and 

Appointment With Death
 (1988).


Had she still been alive, Christie might well have  been less sanguine about Ustinov's portrayal, given that Poirot, written as short, slim, and with coal-black hair, bore little resemblance to the tall, heavy, grey-haired Ustinov. When Christie's daughter, 

Rosalind Hicks
, observed to Ustinov that Poirot did not look like him, Ustinov quipped  He does now! 44


He appeared again as Poirot in three 
made-for-television movies: 
Thirteen at Dinner (1985), 





Dead Man's Folly




 (1986), and 
Murder in Three Acts (1986). The first of these was based on 





Lord Edgware Dies




 and was made by 
Warner Brothers. It also starred 


Faye Dunaway

 and David Suchet as Inspector Japp, just before he himself played the famous detective. (Ironically, it is reputed that David Suchet highlights his performance as Japp to be  possibly the worst performance of [his] career. )45




Other







Tony Randall
, 

The Alphabet Murders
 (1965) (Film, also known as The ABC Murders). This was more a satire on Poirot than a straightforward adaptation, and was greatly changed from the original. It turned the sharp and observant detective into a blundering buffoon who solves the case almost by accident.



Dudley Jones, 

The Strange Case of the End of Civilization as We Know It
 (1977), a spoof of 

Sherlock Holmes
 by 






John Cleese





.







Television








David Suchet





David Suchet

 has starred as the eponymous 

Agatha Christie's Poirot
 in the 

ITV
 series. Three of the four new episodes - Mrs McGinty's Dead, Cat Among the Pigeons and Third Girl, have recently been broadcast on UK television (in September 2008).  Appointment with Death is scheduled to be broadcast later in the same year. Suchet is often considered to be the definitive Poirot and is the most well known.




Other








Ian Holm

, Murder by the Book, 1986 (TV) 




Alfred Molina
, 

Murder on the Orient Express
, 2001 (TV)







Animated


In 2004, 

NHK
 (a Japanese TV network) produced a 39 episode 
anime series titled 
Agatha Christie's Great Detectives Poirot and Marple, as well as a 
manga series under the same title released in 2005. 


The series, adapting several of the best-known Poirot and Marple stories, ran from July 4, 2004 through May 15, 2005, and is now being shown as re-runs on 

NHK
 and other networks in Japan. Poirot was voiced by Satomi K tar  and Miss Marple was voiced by 






Yachigusa Kaoru





.




Radio


There have been a number of radio adaptations of the Poirot stories, most recently on 

BBC Radio 4
 (and regularly repeated on 

BBC 7
) starring 
John Moffatt. A 1945 radio series of at least 11 original half-hour episodes starred character actor 

Harold Huber
46, perhaps better known for his appearances as a police officer in various 










Charlie Chan









 films.47




Parodies and references


In Neil Simon's 
Murder By Death, James Coco plays a character named  Milo Perrier  who is a parody of Poirot.  The film also features parodies of 










Charlie Chan









, 







Sam Spade






, 
Nick and Nora Charles, and 

Miss Marple
.


Poirot was also parodied in 
The Goodies episode '

Daylight Robbery on the Orient Express
. 


The British television show 

Count Duckula
 features a parody of Hercule Poirot (in passing) known as Mr. Hercules Parrot, arm in arm with a character called Miss Marbles.


Although not strictly a reference to Poirot, the new series Christe and Doyle will feature a lead role similar to that of Hercule Poirot. With the name of the character being similar to that of Poirot's creator Agatha Christie and his being half Belgian, Christe also shares many of Poirot's methods and characteristics, the series is expected to begin filming in the late summer in 

Sandhurst
.


An episode of 

Animaniacs
 featured 
Yakko Warner as  Hercule Yakko . The episode involved the theft of a diamond on a train, involving much of the series' cast as suspects. 


In the movie 
Spiceworld, Hercule Poirot (




Hugh Laurie



) is about to blame a weapons-packing 





Emma Bunton




, but after she flashes him an innocent smile, Poirot instead accuses an innocent man of the crime.


In , Poirot appears as a young boy on the train transporting Holmes and Watson. Holmes helps the boy in opening a puzzle-box, with Watson giving the boy advice about using his  little grey cells , giving the impression that Poirot first heard the line here. Poirot would go on to use the  little grey cells  line countless times throughout Agatha Christie's fiction.


In an episode of 

Muppets Tonight
, 

Jason Alexander
 played Hercule Poirot, believed by the Muppets to be 





Hercules




 Poirot, with superhuman powers.


The Belgian brewery Brasserie Ellezelloise makes a highly rated stout called Hercule48 with a moustachioed caricature of Hercule Poirot on the label.









Dave Stone





 has created two parodies of Poirot named Dupont. The first, Andre Dupont, appears in the 










Detective-Judge Armitage









 story Dowager Duchess of Ghent49. The second, Emile Dupont, appears in the 












Bernice Summerfield











 novel 












Ship of Fools











.


The  decipherer of enigmas  in 
Jose Carlos Somoza's novel 





The Athenian Murders




 is named Herakles Pontor.


In the English version of 










Geronimo Stilton









 series, the main protagonist has a friend named  Hercule Poirat .


In the anime and manga series 
Detective Conan, 
Mouri Kogoro's detective agency is located above the Poirot cafe.  A profile summary of Hercule appears at the end of volume 3 of the manga.


In the Israeli sitcom '
The Pajamas', one of the characters of Kobi is a grotesque policeman named 'Marcel Fuero', as a reference to Poirot ('Poirot' and 'Fuero' are written the same way in Hebrew,      ).





See also





 
Plot devices in Agatha Christie's novels






 References 





 Chris Willis, London Metropolitan University.  
Agatha Christie (1890-1976) . Retrieved on 
2006-09-06.

 Reproduced as the  Introduction  to Christie, Agatha. Hercule Poirot: The complete short stories (Harper Collins, 1999) p. viii 

See 








C. Auguste Dupin#Literary influence and significance







.

 
Official Agatha Christie Website . Retrieved on 
2006-09-05.

Chris Willis, London Metropolitan University.  
Agatha Christie (1890-1976) . Retrieved on 
2006-09-06.

 The Mysterious Affair at Styles, Chapter 2 

(though many of his screen incarnations are portrayed as bald or balding). As Hastings discovers in The A.B.C. Murders, Chapter 1 

 e.g.  For about ten minutes [Poirot] sat in dead silence [ ] and all the time his eyes grew steadily greener  The Mysterious Affair at Styles, Chapter 5

e.g.  Hercule Poirot looked down at the tips of his patent-leather shoes and sighed.   The Apples of the Hesperides  (1940)

e.g.  And now here was the man himself. Really a most impossible person   the wrong clothes   button boots! an incredible moustache! Not his   Meredith Blake's kind of fellow at all.  Five Little Pigs, Chapter 7.

Death in the Clouds, Chapter 1.

 My stomach, it is not happy on the sea  Evil under the Sun, Chapter 8, iv

Mrs. McGinty's Dead, Chapter 1

 he walked up the steps to the front door and pressed the bell, glancing as he did so at the neat wrist-watch which had at last replaced an old favourite   the large turnip-faced watch of early days. Yes, it was exactly nine-thirty. As ever, Hercule Poirot was exact to the minute.   The Dream  (1937)

 It has been said of Hercule Poirot by some of his friends and associates, at moments when he has maddened them most, the he prefers lies to truth and will go out of his way to gain his ends by elaborate false statements, rather than trust to the simple truth.  Five Little Pigs, Book One, Chapter 9

 The Stymphalean Birds  (first published as  The Vulture Women  in 1939)

 e.g.  After a careful study of the goods displayed in the window, Poirot entered and represented himself as desirous of purchasing a rucksack for a hypothetical nephew.  Hickory Dickory Dock, Chapter 13 

After the Funeral, Chapter 18.

Three Act Tragedy, final chapter

Captain Arthur Hastings in Chapter 9 of The Big Four''

 Bunson, Matthew (2000).  Hastings, Captain Arthur, O.B.E. . The Complete Christie: An Agatha Christie Encyclopedia.  New York: Pocket Books. 

 The Labours of Hercules , Foreword

Dr. Sheppard in Chapter 21 of The Murder of Roger Ackroyd''

In Taken at the Flood, Book II, Chapter 6 he goes into church to pray and happens across a suspect with whom he briefly discusses ideas of sin and confession.

 Hercule Poirot was a Catholic by birth.   The Apples of the Hesperides  (1940)

The date is given in Peril at End House, Chapter 15.

The Mysterious Affair at Styles, Chapter 7

 Double Sin  (original version published in 1928)

Curtain: Poirot's Last Case, Postscript

 Recounted in  The Kidnapped Prime Minister . The events in the story are immediately connected with the First World War, and feature an  Allied Conference  at 





Versailles




 that is probably meant to be understood as the 

Versailles Peace Conference
 of 1919.

 It is clear that Hastings and Poirot are already friends when they meet in Chapter 2 of the novel, because Hastings tells Cynthia that he has not seen him for  some years . The date of 1916 for the case, and the fact that Hastings had met Poirot in Belgium, is given in Curtain: Poirot's Last Case, Chapter 1.

  The Capture of Cerebus  (1947) The first sentence quoted is also a close paraphrase of something said to Poirot by Hastings in Chapter 18 of The Big Four.

Dr. Burton in the Preface to The Labours of Hercules (1947).

Hastings first visits the flat at Whitehaven Mansions when he returns to England in June 1935. The A.B.C. Murders, Chapter 1 (It is a plot point in the novel that the flat is at Whitehaven Mansions because a letter to Poirot is misaddressed.) In Cat Among the Pigeons, Chapter 17, III, the address is given as  228 Whitehouse Mansions . Given the similarity in the names it is not impossible that the same address was meant. In The Clocks, Chapter 14, the address is given as 203, Whitehaven Mansions.

 Poirot, in  The Kidnapped Prime Minister  (1923) 

Hastings, in Chapter One of The Big Four''

The Third Girl, Chapter 1

The Clocks, Chapter 13: in response to the suggestion that he might take up gardening in his retirement, Poirot answers  Once the vegetable marrows, yes   but never again 

Mrs. McGinty's Dead, Chapter 4

Norma Restarick to Poirot in Third Girl, Chapter 1


TV   Film page at the Hercule Poirot Central website.

The Clocks, Chapter 14

In The Pale Horse, Chapter 1, the novel's narrator, Mark Easterbrook, disapprovingly describes a typical  Chelsea girl  in much the same terms that Poirot uses in Chapter 1 of Third Girl, suggesting that the condemnation of fashion is authorial.


A list of episodes of the half-hour 1945 radio program


IMDB listing for Charlie Chan in Monte Carlo''


Web page at mapdig.com


Web page on 


David Suchet

 at strandmag.com


Armitage


Brasserie Ellezeloise






 External links 






Agatha Christie's Hercule Poirot


  
The Mysterious Affair at Styles'' at 

Project Gutenberg
 












Works by Agatha Christie|Works by 



Agatha Christie










Detectives



Hercule Poirot
    

Miss Marple
    
Tommy and Tuppence    

Ariadne Oliver
    

Arthur Hastings
    










Superintendent Battle









    










Chief Inspector Japp









    










Parker Pyne









    

Mr. Harley Quin








Novels by Agatha Christie|Novels







The Mysterious Affair at Styles




    





The Secret Adversary




    





The Murder on the Links




    





The Man in the Brown Suit




    





The Secret of Chimneys




    





The Murder of Roger Ackroyd




    





The Big Four




    





The Mystery of the Blue Train




    





The Seven Dials Mystery




    





The Murder at the Vicarage




    









The Sittaford Mystery








    





Peril at End House




    





Lord Edgware Dies




    





Murder on the Orient Express




    





Why Didn't They Ask Evans?




   





Three Act Tragedy




    





Death in the Clouds




    





The A.B.C. Murders




    





Murder in Mesopotamia




    







Cards on the Table






    





Dumb Witness




    





Death on the Nile




    





Appointment with Death




    





Hercule Poirot's Christmas




    







Murder is Easy






    







And Then There Were None






    





Sad Cypress




    

One, Two, Buckle My Shoe
    





Evil Under the Sun




    





N or M?




    





The Body in the Library




    





Five Little Pigs




    





The Moving Finger




    







Towards Zero






    





Death Comes as the End




    





Sparkling Cyanide




    





The Hollow




    





Taken at the Flood




    





Crooked House




    





A Murder is Announced




    





They Came to Baghdad




    





Mrs McGinty's Dead




    





They Do It with Mirrors




    





After the Funeral




    





A Pocket Full of Rye




    





Destination Unknown




    





Hickory Dickory Dock




    





Dead Man's Folly




    





4.50 from Paddington




    





Ordeal by Innocence




    





Cat Among the Pigeons




    





The Pale Horse




    





The Mirror Crack'd from Side to Side




    





The Clocks




    





A Caribbean Mystery




    





At Bertram's Hotel




    





Third Girl




    





Endless Night




    





By the Pricking of My Thumbs




    





Hallowe'en Party




    





Passenger to Frankfurt




    





Nemesis




    





Elephants Can Remember




    





Postern of Fate




    





Curtain




    





Sleeping Murder




''







Novels by Agatha Christie|As Mary Westmacott







Giant's Bread




    





Unfinished Portrait




    





Absent in the Spring




    
The Rose and the Yew Tree    







A Daughter's a Daughter






    





The Burden




''







Short story collections by Agatha Christie|Short story collections



Poirot Investigates
    

Partners in Crime
    

The Mysterious Mr. Quin
    

The Thirteen Problems
    

The Hound of Death
    

The Listerdale Mystery
    

Parker Pyne Investigates
    

Murder in the Mews
    


The Regatta Mystery

    

The Labours of Hercules
    
The Witness for the Prosecution and Other Stories    
Three Blind Mice and Other Stories    
The Under Dog and Other Stories    


The Adventure of the Christmas Pudding

    
Double Sin and Other Stories    
The Golden Ball and Other Stories    

Poirot's Early Cases
    
Miss Marple's Final Cases and Two Other Stories    
Problem at Pollensa Bay and Other Stories    


The Harlequin Tea Set

    
While the Light Lasts and Other Stories''







Agatha Christie plays|Plays



Black Coffee
    

And Then There Were None
    

Appointment with Death
    

Murder on the Nile/Hidden Horizon
    

The Hollow
    

The Mousetrap
    

Witness for the Prosecution
    

Spider's Web
    

The Unexpected Guest
    

Verdict
    




Rule of Three



    

Fiddlers Three
    

Akhnaton
    

Chimneys
''







Radio (and Television) Plays










Wasp's Nest







    




The Yellow Iris



    
Three Blind Mice    




Butter In a Lordly Dish



    




Personal Call



''







Books by Agatha Christie|Other books



The Road of Dreams
    

Come, Tell Me How You Live
    
Star Over Bethlehem and other stories    

Poems
    ''


















</doc>

<doc><docno>3000</docno>







A.D. Police
3000

238432959
2008-09-14T20:41:50Z

Closedmouth
372693



Viz Media manga
Manga of 1989
A.D. Police
Madman Entertainment anime
Detective anime and manga
Cyberpunk anime and manga
Dengeki Comics




Infobox animanga/Manga


Bandai B-Club




Flag of France


 
Samurai Editions 


Flag of Germany


 
Feest comics 


Flag of the United States


 
VIZ


Tony Takezaki

August 1990

1

November 1989




Flag of Japan


 
Byakuya Shobo



Infobox animanga/Header






Cyberpunk, 






Detective fiction







AD.POLICE Shuuen Toshi

AD.POLICE     

AD. Police





|}


AD Police (AD.POLICE     , AD.POLICE Shuuen Toshi) is a 
manga series by 
Tony Takezaki set in the 






Bubblegum Crisis





 universe. The story focuses on the members of the AD Police, an advanced group of officers tasked with stopping 
terrorist activities and 
Boomer crimes in the city of Megatokyo.


The AD Police has been featured in the 
AD Police Files 
original video animation and the  
television series.



 Plot 


The AD Police are an elite group of highly trained and specially equipped 
police officers who have been formed to deal with 
terrorist activities and Boomer crimes in the city of 
Megatokyo. They are more heavily armed and equipped (including power armors like the K-11 and K-12) for a normal police force, but too lightly for a military organization. 


The AD Police are offered a great deal of leeway in their activities, often blockading large sections of the city and causing great amounts of property damage in the course of fulfilling their duty. Despite their dedication to their jobs, however, the citizens of Megatokyo tend to dislike and distrust members of the AD Police, seeing them as corrupt and ineffectual.




 Appearances in other media 



The AD Police have been featured in:



 
AD Police Files''


 






Bubblegum Crisis





''


 
Bubblegum Crash''


 












Bubblegum Crisis Tokyo 2040











''


 ''


 








Parasite Dolls







''






 External links 



A.D. Police (manga) at 

Anime News Network
's Encyclopedia





Bubblegum Crisis


 






Bubblegum Crisis





 - 
Bubblegum Crash - 












Bubblegum Crisis Tokyo 2040











''



 






A.D. Police







Similar setting



 
A.D. Police Files - ''

 








Parasite Dolls







''



 
Characters



 
Knight Sabers: 









Priss Asagiri








 - 








Linna Yamazaki







 - 













Nene Romanova












 - 








Sylia Stingray











 A.D. Police: 
Leon McNichol - 
Daley Wong - 
Chief Todo - 









Jeena Malso










 GENOM: 
Brian J. Mason - 
Quincy Rosencroitz



 Other characters: 


Mackey Stingray

 - 
Fargo - 












Nigel Kirkland











 - 












Galatea











 - 
Boomers
















</doc>

<doc><docno>6000</docno>

History of Comoros
6000

240514990
2008-09-23T19:58:41Z

MystBot
6424168



History of Comoros




The History of Comoros is perhaps 1500 years old.  It has been inhabited by various groups throughout this time.  

France
 colonised the islands in the 
19th century. 

Comoros
 finally became independent in 1971


Early inhabitants


It is thought that the Comoros islands were first visited by Phoenician sailors12.  The earliest inhabitants of the islands may have been 5th or 
6th Century Melanesian or Polynesian sailors3; a 6th Century settlement 
on Nzwani was found by archaeologists4.  Traces of this original 
Asian culture have blended with successive waves of 
African, 

Arab
 and 
Shirazi immigrants.  


Bantu peoples

 apparently moved to Comoros before the 14th Century, principally from the coast of what is now southern Mozambique; on the island of 
Nzwani (French Anjouan) they found earlier Malayo-Indonesian    inhabitants4.  However,  locals agree that the islands were first peopled by storm-tossed Arab voyagers.5


The most notable of these early immigrants were the Shirazi Arab royal clans, who arrived in Comoros in the 15th and 16th centuries and stayed to build mosques, create a royal house and introduce 
architecture and 
carpentry.


Over the centuries, the 








Comoro Islands







 were invaded by a succession of diverse groups from the coast of 






Africa





, the 

Persian Gulf
, 

Indonesia
, and 

Madagascar
. Portuguese explorers visited the archipelago in 1505. 


In 1529 the French Parmentier brothers came, but the first reliable European accounts of this part of the world came from the Portuguese explorers, 




Diogo Dias



 and 
Fernando Soares. The Portuguese failed to capitalise on being the first Europeans to reach the islands, and for the next century or two the islands were used only on voyages up and down the coast of East Africa. In fact, up until the middle of the 19th century, it was not European explorers but 
pirates from 

Madagascar
 who had the largest impact. During this time the fragmentation of power led to the creation of many statelets, each controlled by a 
sultan and at one stage there were no fewer than 12 sultans on the island of 

Grande Comore
 alone. 


The French turned their attention to the Comoros islands in the middle of the 19th century. The French finally acquired the islands through a cunning mixture of strategies, including the policy of 'divide and conquer', chequebook politics and a serendipitous affair between a sultana and a French trader that was put to good use by the French, who kept control of the islands, quelling unrest and the occasional uprising.


 
Shirazi  migrants introduced 
Islam at about the same time.


For the history of the native sultanates on several of the major islands, see 
Sultans on the Comoros.




 Colonial Rule 





Sultan Said Ali bin Said Omar of Grande Comore (1897)



On 
25 March 
1841, 

France
 annexed the 
Mawuti Maore sultanate (the name of the island was corrupted in French to  Mayotte ) as Mayotte 
protectorate (ratified 
13 June 
1843).  In 1852, 
Andruna is added to Mayotte protectorate and, in 1866, the large sultanate Ndzuwani (on Anjouan island) as well. 


On 
24 June 
1886, the islands of 
Ngazidja (

Grande Comore
 in French) comprised eleven sultanates, but, in 1886, the Sultan tibe (paramount ruler and Sultan) of 








Bambao







 unified them, Ndzuwani (Anjouan), and 
Mwali sultanate (
Moheli island in French) become French protectorates, French 
residents are posted on the three islands; on 
5 September 
1887 they are collectively renamed Protectorate of the Comoros. 


On 
9 April 
1908, France declared the Comoros a dependent territory of its 

Madagascar
 colony. 
On 
25 July 
1912, it was annexed by France and joined with Mayotte as Mayotte and dependencies, after the ratification on 
23 February 
1914 subordinated to the governor general of Madagascar (Comoros dependent colony). 


From 
16 June 
1940 - 1942 the colonial administration remained loyal to 

Vichy France
 (from 1942, under Free French), but 
25 September 
1942 - 
13 October 
1946 they were, like Madagascar, under 











British










 occupation.


Until the opening of the 
Suez Canal, the islands used to be an important refuelling and provisioning station for ships from 
Europe to the 
Indian Ocean.


Independence came gradually for Comoros. During the middle of the 20th century the French reluctantly began to accede to reasonable requests, and by 1947 Comoros had become a separately administered colony from Madagascar. 


After 







World War II






, the islands became a 
French overseas territory and were represented in France's 
National Assembly.  Internal political autonomy was granted in 
1961.  Agreement was reached with France in 
1973 for Comoros to become independent in 
1978.  On 
July 6, 
1975, however, the Comorian parliament passed a resolution declaring unilateral independence.  The deputies of 

Mayotte
 abstained.


In two 
referendums, in December 1974 and February 1976, the population of Mayotte voted against independence from France (by 63.8% and 99.4% respectively).  Mayotte thus remains under French administration, and the Comorian Government has effective control over only Grande Comore, Anjouan, and Moheli.


In 1961 it was granted autonomous rule and, seven years after the general unrest and left-wing riots of 1968. Comoros broke all ties with France and established itself as an independent republic. From the very beginning Mayotte refused to join the new republic and aligned itself even more firmly to the French Republic, but the other islands remained committed to independence. The first president of Comoros, 
Ahmed Abdallah Abderemane, did not last long before being 
ousted in a 
coup by 
Ali Solih, an 
atheist with an Islamic background.


Solih began with a set of solid 
socialist ideals designed to modernize the country. However, the regime faced problems. A French mercenary by the name of 


Bob Denard

, arrived in Comoros at dawn on 
13 May 
1978, and removed Solih from power. Solih was shot and killed during the coup. Abdallah returned to govern the country and the mercenaries were given key positions in government.


Later, 

French
 settlers, French-owned companies, and Arab merchants established a plantation-based economy that now uses about one-third of the land for export crops.




Abdallah regime





Main article: 
History of Comoros (1978-1989)

In 1978, president 












Ali Soilih











, who had a firm anti-French line, was killed and 


Ahmed Abdallah

 came to power. Under the reign of Abdallah, Denard was commander of the Presidential Guard (PG) and de facto ruler of the country.  He was trained, supported and funded by the white regimes in 

South Africa
 (SA) and 

Rhodesia
 (now Zimbabwe) in return for permission to set up a secret listening post on the islands. South-African agents kept an ear on the important 

ANC
 bases in 

Lusaka
 and 

Dar es Salaam
 watched the war in Mozambique, in which SA played an active role. The Comoros were also used for the evasion of arms sanctions. 


When in 1981 
Francois Mitterrand was elected president Denard lost the support of the French intelligence service, but he managed to strengthen the link between SA and the Comoros. Besides the military, Denard established his own company SOGECOM, for both the security and construction, and seemed to profit by the arrangement.  Between 1985 an 1987 the relationship of the PG with the local Comorians became worse. 


At the end of the 1980s the South Africans did not wish to continue to support the mercenary regime and France was in agreement. Also President Abdallah wanted the mercenaries to leave. Their response was a (third) coup resulting in the death of President Abdallah, in which Denard and his men were probably involved. South Africa and the French government subsequently forced Denard and his mercenaries to leave the islands in 1989. 




1989-1996












Said Mohamed Djohar








 became president. His time in office was turbulent, including an impeachment attempt in 1991 and a coup attempt in 1992.


On 
September 28, 
1995 Bob Denard and a group of mercenaries took over the Comoros islands in a coup (named operation Kaskari by the mercenaries) against President Djohar. France immediately severely denounced the coup, and backed by the 
1978 defense agreement with the Comoros, President 


Jacques Chirac

 ordered his special forces to retake the island. Bob Denard began to take measures to stop the coming invasion. A new presidential guard was created. Strong points armed with heavy machine guns were set up around the island, particularly around the island's two airports. 


On 
October 3, 
1995, 11 p.m., the French deployed 600 men against a force of 33 mercenaries and a 300 man dissident force. Denard however ordered his mercenaries not to fight. Within 7 hours the airports at Iconi and Hahaya and the French Embassy in Moroni were secured. By 3:00 p.m. the next day Bob Denard and his mercenaries had surrendered. This (response) operation, codenamed Azalee, was remarkable, because there were no casualties, and just in seven days, plans were drawn up and soldiers were deployed. Denard was taken to France and jailed. Prime minister 
Caambi El-Yachourtu became acting president until Djohar returned from exile in January, 1996. In March 1996, following presidential elections, 









Mohamed Taki Abdoulkarim








, a member of the civilian government that Denard had tried to set up in October 1995, became president.




Secession of Anjouan and Moheli


In 
1997, the islands of 

Anjouan
 and 
Moheli declared their independence from Comoros. A subsequent attempt by the government to re-establish control over the rebellious islands by force failed, and presently the 

African Union
 is brokering negotiations to effect a reconciliation. This process is largely complete, at least in theory. According to some sources, Moheli did return to government control in 1998. In 1999, Anjouan had internal conflicts and on August 1 of that year, the 80-year-old first president 
Foundi Abdallah Ibrahim resigned, transferring power to a national coordinator, 
Said Abeid. The government was overthrown in a coup by army and navy officers on 
August 9, 
2001. 





Mohamed Bacar




 soon rose to leadership of the 
junta that took over and by the end of the month he was the leader of the country. Despite two coup attempts in the following three months, including one by Abeid, Bacar s government remained in power, and was apparently more willing to negotiate with Comoros. Presidential elections were held for all of Comoros in 2002, and presidents have been chosen for all three islands as well, which have become a confederation. Most notably, Mohammed Bacar was elected for a 5-year term as president of Anjouan. Grande Comore had experienced troubles of its own in the late 1990s, when President Taki died on 
November 6, 
1998. Colonel 





Azali Assoumani




 became president following a military coup in 1999. There have been several coup attempts since, but he gained firm control of the country after stepping down temporarily and winning a presidential election in 2002.


In May 
2006, 
Ahmed Abdallah Sambi was elected from the island of 

Anjouan
 to be the president of the 
Union of Comoros. He is a well-respected 
Sunni cleric who studied in the 

Sudan
, 

Iran
 and 

Saudi Arabia
. He is respectfully called  
Ayatollah  by his supporters but is considered, and is, a moderate 
Islamist. He has been quoted as stating that Comoros is not ready to become an Islamic state, nor shall the 
veil be forced upon any women in the Comoros.6.




2007-2008 Anjouan crisis





Main article: 

2008 invasion of Anjouan







References







  Comoros History , Encyclopedia of the Nations 


 Zanzinet Forum


  Comoros History , Encyclopedia Britannica''


  Early voyages and settlements , Country Studies

 Comoros Islands , Encyclopedia Britannica (1911)


 Reports from allafrica.com







External links





 
More on the 1995 Azalee Operation


 
WorldStatesmen- Comoros, with relevant links


 
History of Comoros













 


Flag of France


 








French overseas empire














Former








Former French colonies in 






Africa





 and the 
Indian Ocean







Mahgreb


Algeria    

Morocco
 (




Arguin Island



)    

Tunisia









French West Africa



Cote d'Ivoire    

Dahomey
    

French Sudan
    

Guinea
    
Mauritania    
Niger    
Senegal    

Upper Volta







 



French Togoland
    

James Island









French Equatorial Africa



Chad    
Gabon    
Middle Congo    




Oubangui-Chari












Comoros




Anjouan
    

Grande Comore
    
Moheli






 


French Somaliland (Djibouti)    
Madagascar    

Ile de France
    

Seychelles














Former French colonies in the 





Americas













New France
  (

Acadia
   

Louisiana
   

Canada
   






Terre Neuve





) 1655   1763











Inini



    




Berbice



    

Saint-Domingue
 (

Haiti
)    




Tobago



    
Virgin Islands    




France Antarctique



    
France Equinoxiale









French West India Company















Former French colonies in 



Asia


 and 



Oceania











French India



Chandernagor    




Coromandel Coast



    
Madras    


Malabar

    
Mahe    
Pondichery    

Karaikal
    
Yanaon








French Indochina




Cambodia
    
Laos    

Vietnam
 (

Annam
    




Cochinchina



    






Tonkin





)






Other Asian



Alaouites
    
Alexandretta-Hatay    

Ceylon
    
Kwangchowan










Oceania









New Hebrides



 (
Vanuatu)









French East India Company














Present







Flag of France


 
Overseas departments and territories of 

France










 Inhabited areas















Overseas department




s1



French Guiana
    
Guadeloupe    

Martinique
    
Reunion




Location of French Overseas Territories















Overseas collectivities








French Polynesia
    

Mayotte
2    
Saint Barthelemy    

Saint Martin
    
Saint Pierre and Miquelon    
Wallis and Futuna






Special status



New Caledonia
















 Uninhabited areas









Pacific Ocean










Clipperton Island















French Southern and
Antarctic Lands





Ile Amsterdam    
Ile Saint-Paul    

Crozet Islands
    

Kerguelen Islands
    
Adelie Land















Scattered islands inthe Indian Ocean


















Bassas da India







3    








Europa Island







3    








Glorioso Islands







2, 3, 4    








Juan de Nova Island







3    








Tromelin Island







5















1 Also known as 
overseas regions.  2 Claimed by 

Comoros
.  3 Claimed by 

Madagascar
.  4 Claimed by 

Seychelles
.  5 Claimed by 

Mauritius
.



















History of 






Africa













Sovereign states




Algeria   

Angola   

Benin   

Botswana   

Burkina Faso   

Burundi   

Cameroon   

Cape Verde   

Central African Republic   

Chad   

Comoros   

Democratic Republic of the Congo   

Republic of the Congo   

Cote d'Ivoire (Ivory Coast)   

Djibouti   

Egypt1   

Equatorial Guinea   

Eritrea   

Ethiopia   

Gabon   

The Gambia   

Ghana   

Guinea   

Guinea-Bissau   

Kenya   

Lesotho   

Liberia   

Libya   

Madagascar   

Malawi   

Mali   

Mauritania   

Mauritius   

Morocco   

Mozambique   

Namibia   

Niger   

Nigeria   

Rwanda   

Sahrawi Arab Democratic Republic   

Sao Tome and Principe   

Senegal   

Seychelles   

Sierra Leone   

Somalia   

South Africa   

Sudan   

Swaziland   

Tanzania   

Togo   

Tunisia   

Uganda   

Zambia   

Zimbabwe













Dependencies




,

autonomies,other 
territories




Canary Islands /  
Ceuta /  
Melilla (Spain)   

Madeira (Portugal)   

Mayotte /  
Reunion (France)   

Puntland   

St. Helena (UK)   

Socotra (Yemen)   

Somaliland   

Southern Sudan   

Western Sahara   

Zanzibar(Tanzania)







Italics indicate an 
unrecognised or partially recognised country. 
1 
Transcontinental country. 












 







</doc>

<doc><docno>7000</docno>


List of companies of Canada
7000

244481746
2008-10-11T00:42:29Z

Epbr123
1395162



Companies of Canada
Canada-related lists
Lists of companies by country




This is a list of 
companies from 

Canada
.



 See also 
Companies of Canada.


 To make this page easier to read and edit, 
Defunct Canadian Companies has been placed on a separate page.






Contents


    
A 
B 
C 
D 
E 
F 
G 
H 
I 
J 
K 
L 
M 
N 
O 
P 
Q 
R 
S 
T 
U 
V 
W 
X 
Y 
Z


__NOTOC__



 Current Companies




A







AbeBooks
 (online book store site)





Algorithmics Inc.

 (risk management services)




Agrium
 (agricultural products)




Aklak Air
 (airline)




Alberta Citylink
 (airline)



Alcan (aluminum)









Alexander Keith's





 (brewery)




Aliant
 (telecommunications)



Alimentation Couche-Tard Inc. (convenience stores)







AllCanada Express



 (airline)




Alliance Atlantis





Alta Flights
 (airline)








AMEX Bank of Canada




 (bank/charge cards)




Angoss
 (software)








Arc'teryx




 (outdoor clothing) -- Finnish owned




Army   Navy Stores (Canada)
 (retail)




ATCO
 




Atomic Energy of Canada Limited
 (engineering/research/nuclear)



ATN




Astral Media




Atlantic Hurricane Magazine (magzine)





Avenue Video





Automatic Earth (film post-production/multimedia services)






B







Ballard Power Systems





Bank of Montreal





Barrick Gold
 (gold)




BC Hydro








BC Research Inc







Bell Canada Enterprises












Becker's













Biovail
 (Pharmaceutical)




BioWare
 (video games)



Black Diamond Cheese Limited




Blenz Coffee




Bombardier








Bombardier Recreational Products




 spun off as an independent company in 2003




Boston Pizza






Brookfield Asset Management

 (assorted activities) 





Buck or Two Extreme Retail, Inc.

 (retail)






Buckley's








Brick Brewing Company






Bruce Power





Bluenotes







C











Cadillac Fairview




 (property)




CAE
 (
flight simulators and training)



CakeMail (Software)



Calm Air (airline)




Cameco
 (uranium)









Canada Deposit Insurance Corporation





 (Government-owned bank account insurance company)









Canadian Bank Note Company





 (money and passport printing)




Canadian Broadcasting Corporation
 (CBC) (Government-owned Canadian TV and Radio broadcaster)




Canadian Hydro Developers
 (power generation)







Canadian Light Source, Inc.



 (research)











Canadian National Railway







 (railway)



Canadian Natural Resources Ltd. (oil/gas)



Canadian Pacific Railway Limited (railway)




Canadian Oil Sands Trust
 (oil)






Canadian Salt Company


 



Canadian Steamship Lines (cargo shipping)




Canadian Tire
 (retail)






Canadian Tire Financial Services


 (credit card company) 




Canadian Western Bank
 (banking)




CanJet
 (Airline) 




Canwest
 (broadcast)




Cara Operations
 (food services)





Cargill Ltd.

 



Casavant Freres




Celestica






Central Heat Distribution

 (district heating Vancouver)




Central Mountain Air
 (airline)




CGI Group
 (IT consulting)



Chapters




CHUM Limited
 (broadcast)



CIBC (banking)








Cineplex Entertainment









Cirque du Soleil





Citizens Bank of Canada
 (banking)








Coffee Time




 (coffee shops)




Cognos
 (software)





Conestoga-Rovers   Associates

 (engineering)










Corby Distilleries






 (alcohol)



Corel (software)




Corus Entertainment
 - a Canadian entertainment company




Cott















Country Style










 (coffee shops)




Cossette Communication Group







CP Ships






CSA Group (standards/testing lab)




CTVglobemedia
 (media)




CTV
 (broadcast)






D






DaimlerChrysler Canada






Dalsa








Dart Flipcards Inc.










Delta Hotels










Digital Extremes

 (video games, e.g., co-producer of Unreal Tournament)






Dofasco


 (Now owned by 

Luxembourg
's 

Arcelor
)




Dollarama
 (retail)





Domtar

 (pulp and paper company)




DreamCatcher Games
 (video games, e.g., Painkiller, Crystal Key, Cold War)



Dynasty EV






E









Electrohome











Emera








EnCana




Enbridge









Enwave




 District heating/cooling in Toronto






F






Fairmont Hotels and Resorts




Falconbridge Ltd.




Fairweather




First Air





Flickr
 (a popular photo sharing website - bought by Yahoo!)





Forzani Group

 (sports retail)



Ford Motor Company of Canada, Limited




Fortis Inc.




Four Seasons Hotel



Fort Garry Brewery



FreshBooks




Future Shop
 -- American owned






G








Gabriel Kney






General Motors Canada




GEM-UP Consulting




Gennum Corp.





George Weston Limited
 (Foods)




Giant Tiger
 (discount store)



Goldcorp (gold)




The Great-West Life Assurance Company







H






Harlequin Enterprises Ltd














Harry Rosen Inc.










 (retail)





Hart Stores





Harvey's




Hatch Ltd




Heroux-Devtek




Hitachi Canadian Industries





Holt Renfrew
 (retail)




Home Hardware
 (retail)



Honda Canada




HSBC Bank Canada






Hudson Boatworks






Hudson's Bay Company
 




Husky Energy




Hydro-Quebec






I






IDA (drug store)




IL Therapeutics
 - bio-tech




IMAX Corporation






IMP Group






Imperial Oil
 (Esso)



Indigo Books and Music




Info-Tech Research Group
 (IT research and consulting organization)






Innovation Place Research Park


 (research parks)





Intelligent Creatures

 (visual effects post-production company)





Intrawest





Investors Group




Irving Oil







J







Jazz Air LP
 (airlines operates as Air Canada Jazz]





Jean Coutu

 (pharmacies)




Jim Pattison Group







K






Katz Group




Kelowna Flightcraft Ltd.





Kelowna Flightcraft Air Charter







Kinross Gold








Kruger Inc.








L







La Maison Simons
 (retail)



Labatt Brewing Company (now owned by Belgian brewer 

InBev
)






Laurentian Bank of Canada






LearnHub



Leger Marketing (polls and market research)








Lee Valley Tools




 (retail)




Leon's





Linamar




Lions Gate Films




Liquidation World
 (retail)




Lise Watier
 




Loblaws





London Drugs









London Life Insurance Company









Look Communications




Lorus Therapeutics Inc. (biotechnology)



Lululemon (retail)






M






Mac's Milk




MacDonald Dettwiler











Mad Genius Software











Magna International





Manitoba Hydro





Manitoba Telecom Services
 (MTS)




Manulife Financial





Maple Leaf Sports   Entertainment
 (owner of Toronto Maple Leafs, Raptors)






Maple Leaf Foods


 (food products)




Matrox









Maritime Life














Mark's Work Wearhouse











Masonite International







Memotec





McCain Foods (world's largest manufacturer of french fries)



McClelland and Stewart, book publishers



McDonald's Restaurants of Canada




MDS Inc.




Microcell Telecommunications (Owner of Fido digital wireless services)




Mitel






Molson











Moosehead










MuchMusic







N





N8 Identity (Identity Management Solutions)




National Bank of Canada




Netfirms (internet)




Nexen
 (oil/gas)




Nelvana
 (entertainment)




New Flyer Industries
 (Bus manufacture)




New York Fries
 (fast food)




Nintendo of Canada




Nortel Networks (telecommunications)





North West Company

 (retail)



NorandaFalconbridge (mining)



NOVA Chemicals












Nova Scotia Power














Novelis

 (aluminum)






O












Oland Brewery











Onex Corporation







Ontario Swine Improvement






Open Text Corporation
 (software)



Orca Bay Sports and Entertainment



Omer Sheriff Company






 P 





 

Pacific Coastal Airlines
 (airline)


 

Pan American Silver Corporation
  


 



Paramount Resources





 

Para-Ordnance



 






Parasuco








 




Parmalat Canada



 (food products)


 


Persona Communications

 


 

Petro-Canada
 (retail gasoline chain   refiner)


 

Pizza Pizza
 


 


Prairie Plant Systems




 

PMC-Sierra



 

Power Corporation of Canada
 


 

Porter Airlines
 (airline)


 

Potash Corporation of Saskatchewan



 

Power Corporation of Canada



 

Precision Drilling



 





Prevost Car




 (Bus Manufacturer Wholly Owned by Volvo AB)


 
Priszm Canadian Income Fund


 






Pronto Airways





 (airline)


 

Purolator Courier
 (point to point package delivery)






Q







QNX
 (software - operating systems)




Quebecor
 (printing / media)






R





 

Rare Method Interactive Studios, Inc
 (interactive marketing agency)


 



Redpath Sugar





 


Reitmans




 

Relic Entertainment
 (video games, e.g., Homeworld)


 

Research In Motion
 (notable for PIM software)


 

Ricky's All Day Grill
 


 

Ritchie Bros. Auctioneers



 

Rogers Communications
 (cable TV systems)


 

Rona
 (home renovations supplies)


 
Roots Canada (clothing: Canada theme)


 

Royal Canadian Mint
 (collector coins)


 

Royal Bank of Canada



 





RSM Richter




 (Accounting firm)






S







SAAN
 (retail)












Sandman Hotels













Sandvine
 (networking equipment)



Saputo (dairy products)




Saskatchewan Government Insurance
 (insurance)




SRC
 (research)




SaskPower
 (electricity)




SaskTel
 (Telecom)



Save-on-Foods



Savvica




Scotiabank
 (Bank of Nova Scotia)



Scott Paper Limited




Sears Canada





Second Cup







Stelco






Shaw Cable




Shell Canada





Shoppers Drug Mart
 (drug store chain)






Shore Tilbe Irwin + Partners







Sierra Wireless





Skyline Aviation Software






Sleeman Breweries







Sleep Country Canada

 (mattresses)




SlipStream Data
 (software)




SNC-Lavalin
 (engineering)




Sobeys





Softimage






Sosign Interactive






Suncor Energy
 (energy)



Sun Life Assurance




Sun-Rype
 (food and beverage)




Sunward Aerospace Group Limited
 (model rockets and hobbies)



Symphonex




Syncrude





Swiss Chalet







T







Talisman Energy




Talkster



TD Waterhouse Group




Teck Cominco




Telesat Canada




Telus
 (telecommunications)



Tembec





Terasen Inc







Terasen Gas

 (formerly BC Gas)




The Brick






The Ocean Group






Timothy's World Coffee







T















The Source by Circuit City












Thomson Corporation





Tilley Endurables






Tim Hortons
 (owned by TDL Group which owns Wendy's)




Tolko
 (forestry)




Toronto-Dominion Bank





Toronto Stock Exchange





Torstar





TransCanada Corp.
 (pipelines)




Transwest Air







U





 







Ultramar






 - marketers and refiners of petroleum (www.ultramar.ca)














United Furniture Warehouse

















V






Vaccine and Infectious Disease Organization (research)




Vancouver City Savings Credit Union
 (Vancity) (Banking)











VIA Rail







 (government-owned passenger train service)






W








Wal-Mart Canada

 (retail)




Wardrop Engineering Inc.
 (engineering services)




Waterloo Maple Inc.
 (mathematical software)




West Fraser Timber
 (wood products)




Western Oil Sands
 (oil)




WestJet
 (airline)




West Wind Aviation
 (airline and air services)



Wildcard Pictures (runs 
WILDsound Film Festival)



Winners






X











Xandros




 (software)




XM Radio Canada




http://xtrenergy.ca/




Y






Yamana Gold Inc.






Z









Zarlink


 (semiconductor)







ZENN



 (motor company)



ZENON Environmental (water treatment)




Zellers








 See also 






List of companies listed on the Toronto Stock Exchange



List of Canadian electric utilities



List of Canadian mobile phone companies



List of mutual fund companies in Canada



List of Canadian telephone companies



List of think tanks



List of newspapers



Television network



List of supermarkets



List of restaurant chains



Fast-food restaurant




Toronto Stock Exchange














  

Canada
 
topics







History











Timeline









New France (to 1763)
    
Under British Control (1763-1867)    
Post-Confederation (1867-1914)    
World Wars and Interwar Years (1914-1945)    
1945-1960    
1960-1981    
1982-1992    
since 1992






Topics


Military    
Economy    
Constitution    
Slavery    
Current events










Politics


Law (
Constitution)    

The Crown
    
Governor General    

Parliament
 (
Senate    

House of Commons
)    

Prime Minister
 (
List)    
Elections    
Courts (





Supreme Court




)    
Military    
Local Government    
Foreign relations of Canada







Geography





Regions(west to east)




Coast Mountains

    





Interior Plateau




    





Columbia Mountains




    




Rocky Mountains



    









Prairies








    


Western Canada

    


Northern Canada

    



Canadian Shield


    
Great Lakes    


Central Canada

    



Saint Lawrence Lowlands


    




Appalachian Mountains



    




Arctic Cordillera



    


Atlantic Canada

    


Maritimes








Topics


Animals (
Mammals    
Reptiles)    
Cities    
Wettest-known tropical cyclones    
Extreme communities    
Islands    



Mountains


    
National parks    
Plants    
Regions    
Rivers    







Volcanoes

















Economy


Agriculture    
Banking    

Bank of Canada
    

Canadian dollar
    
Communications    
Companies    
Health care    

Toronto Stock Exchange
    





Taxation




    
Transportation    




Social programs











Demographics




Topics






Immigration



    
Languages    
Religion    












2001 Census











    












2006 Census











    
List of population of Canada by years






Top 100s


Metro areas    
Urban areas    
Municipalities










Culture


Architecture    
Art    
Cinema    
Famous Canadians    
Holidays    
Identity    
Literature    
Music (

Blues
    
Celtic    
Classical    


Hip hop

    


Rock

)    


Nationalism

    
Protection of    
Sport    
Olympics    
Theatre







Symbols



Coat of Arms
    
Flags    

National Flag
    
Provincial and territorial    


Regional tartans

    
Royal symbols    
Heraldry













</doc>

<doc><docno>8000</docno>

Default
8000

242931647
2008-10-04T09:48:59Z

Cyfal
4637213



All disambiguation pages
Disambiguation pages





default, as in failing to meet an obligation, may refer to:



 
Default (law)


 
Default (finance)




default, as a result when no action is taken, may refer to:



 


Default (computer science)

   also contains consumer electronics usage


 
Default logic




It may also refer to:



 


Default (band)

, a Canadian post-grunge and alternative rock band


 
defaults (software), a command line utility for plist (preference) files












This  page lists articles associated with the same title. If an 
internal linkled you here, you may wish to change the link to point directly to the intended article.''







</doc>

<doc><docno>9000</docno>






Death of a Hero
9000

243346993
2008-10-06T03:26:04Z

Lightbot
7178666



Autobiographical novels
World War I novels
1929 novels




Death of a Hero is a 

World War I
 
novel by 











Richard Aldington










. It was his first novel, written in 1929, and thought to be partly 
autobiographical.


Plot summary



Death of a Hero is the story of a young 

English
 
artist named George Winterbourne who enlists in the 
army at the outbreak of World War I. The book is narrated by an unnamed first-person narrator who claims to have known and served with the main character. It is divided into three parts.



Book I



The first part details George's family history. His father, a middle-classed man from England's countryside, marries a poor woman who falsely believes she is marrying into a monied family. After George's birth, his mother takes a series of lovers.


George is brought up to be a proper and patriotic member of English society. He is encouraged to follow in his father's insurance business, but he fails to do so. After a falling out with his parents, he moves to London to pursue art and live a socialite lifestyle.




Book II



The second section of the book deals with George's London life. He ingrains himself in socialite society and engages a number of trendy philosophies.


After he and his lover, Elizabeth, have a pregnancy scare, they decide to marry. Although they do not have a child, the marriage stands. They decide to leave their marriage open. George takes Elizabeth's closet friend as a lover, however, their marriage begins to fall apart. Just as the situation is becoming particularly heated, England declares war on Germany. George decides to enlist.




Book III



George trains for the army and is sent to France. (No particular location in France is mentioned. The town behind the front where George spends much of his time is referred to as M---.) He fights on the front for some time. When he returns home, he finds that he has been so affected by the war that he cannot related to his friends, including his wife and lover.


The casualty rate among officers is particularly high at the front. When a number of officers in George's unit are killed, he is promoted. Upon spending time with the other officers, he finds them to be cynical and utilitarian. He loses faith in the war quickly.


The story ends with George standing up during a machine-gun barrage. He is killed.


At the end of the book there is a poem written from the point of view of a veteran comparing World War I to the Trojan War.





Censorship



Aldington, a veteran of World War I, claimed that his novel was accurate in terms of speech and style. It contained extensive colloquial speech, including profanity, discussion of sexuality, and graphic descriptions of the war and of trench life. There were extensive censorship laws in place in England at the time, and many previous war novels had been banned or burned as a result. When Aldington first published his novel, he redacted a number of passages in order to ensure the publication of his book would not be challenged. He insisted that his publishers include a disclaimer in the original printing of the book which included the following text:


To my astonishment, my publisher informed me that certain words, phrases, sentences, and even passages, are at present taboo in England. I have recorded nothing which I have not observed in human life, said nothing I do not believe to be true. [...] At my request the publishers are removing what they believe would be considered objectionable, and are placing asterisks to show where omissions have been made. [...] In my opinion it is better for the book to appear mutilated than for me to say what I don't believe. 




External links





 http://www.dundee.ac.uk/english/english/188.htm#abs1











</doc>

<doc><docno>10000</docno>

Eiffel
10000

241795336
2008-09-29T16:12:36Z

AlexGWU
6177935



All disambiguation pages
Disambiguation pages




Eiffel can refer to several things:



 The 

Eiffel Tower
 in Paris


 

Gustave Eiffel
, engineer and designer of the Eiffel Tower


 


Eiffel (company)

, successor of Gustave Eiffel's engineering company


 The 

Eiffel (programming language)
, developed by Bertrand Meyer and named after Gustave Eiffel, designer of the Eiffel Tower


 

Eiffel Software
, a software company founded by said developer.


 A misspelling of the 
Eifel region of Germany


 


Eiffel 65

, an electronic music group.


 

Alec Eiffel
, a song by the alternative rock band 
Pixies











This  page lists articles associated with the same title. If an 
internal linkled you here, you may wish to change the link to point directly to the intended article.''







</doc>

<doc><docno>12000</docno>


Godzilla vs. Biollante
12000

243036054
2008-10-04T21:23:43Z

Lightbot
7178666



Godzilla films
English-language films
1989 films
Japanese films
Sequel films
Japanese-language films




Infobox_Film





GodzillaBiollante.jpg






Koichi Sugiyama



US $5,000,000



Godzilla vs. King Ghidorah
''

105 min.



The Return of Godzilla
''

1:20094


Kazuki Omori


December 16, 
1989








Biollante







0097444

Godzilla vs. Biollante


Tomoyuki Tanaka






Shogo Tomiyama










Toho





Japanese


English


Story:
Shinichir  KobayashiScreenplay:
Kazuki Omori


Kunihiko Mitamura






Yoshiko Tanaka






Koji Takahashi


Megumi Odaka






Godzilla VS Biollante (   VS     , Gojira tai Biorante) is a 1989 
daikaiju film, the seventeenth entry in 


Toho

's 



Godzilla


 series and a direct sequel to 

The Return of Godzilla
. It was the second film in the series released in the 



Heisei


 period (
Emperor Hirohito had died earlier in the year). The film was written and directed by 
Kazuki Omori with special effects by 

Koichi Kawakita
.

This film focuses on 
biotechnology, specifically the dangers of its use, its potential effects on the 
balance of power, and the threat of 
germ warfare. In addition to the genetic mutation 






Biollante





 and the second incarnation of the  Super X  flying battleship, it features a heavy element of 
espionage and several action sequences inspired by the 

























James Bond
























 films, as for the film's director 
Kazuki Omori himself being a fan of James Bond.


The film is often considered by fans to be a landmark achievement, and has received praise for its creative photography, original plot and special effects.  Some, however, frown upon the movie for its limited amount of actual battle sequences.



Plot



The movie begins where The Return of Godzilla left off, with 



Godzilla


 (Kenpachir  Satsuma) sealed away inside of a volcano and a scientific team picking through the ruins of a ravaged district of 













Tokyo












, searching for tissue samples left behind by Godzilla. A team of American paramilitary soldiers working for a United States-based genetics research company called Bio-Major attempts to escape with a sample, but is overcome by a lone mercenary and the samples are stolen.


Meanwhile, in the 



Middle East


, a 


Japanese

 researcher named Dr. Shiragami (K ji Takahashi) looks forward to returning home to 
Japan with his daughter, Erika (






Yasuko Sawaguchi





). However, a terrorist bombing destroys the research facility in which he works and at the same time, kills his daughter.


Five years later, in 1990; Dr. Shiragami is now a haunted dreamer, who has lately turned most of his attention to the study of the psychic energy of 
roses. A young psychic named 


Miki Saegusa

 (


Megumi Odaka

), who also heads an institution for intuitive children, aids him in his research. Dr. Shiragami is now seen as a harmless old man who uses his scientific knowledge to satisfy his own curiosity.


However, two groups are watching Shiragami: a gang of thieves hired by Bio-Major and an assassin from a Middle Eastern country called Saradia. As it turns out, Dr. Shiragami is involved in the study of Godzilla cells. It is believed by Shiragami's employers that he is aiding them in figuring out how to utilize the cells' properties to create an Anti-Nuclear Bacteria (ANB), which is supposed to be used as weapons against Godzilla. The bacteria are designed to devour all radioactive material, and should prove fatal to Godzilla, but Shiragami, unbeknown to everyone, has been conducting his own secret experiments...


When both the thieves and the assassin catch each other breaking into Shiragami's laboratory, a gunfight ensues. It is interrupted by an attack of a giant, mobile plant that kills one man and nearly kills another. The surviving thief flees, and the assassin barely escapes from the plant's grasp. Neither group realizes that they have just encountered the result of Dr. Shiragami's secret experimentations.


The next morning a giant flower is seen in a nearby lake, and Dr. Shiragami confesses that he combined the DNA of roses with that of Godzilla. Furthermore, he confesses privately to a young official that he had, in a fit of desperate grief, added the DNA of his daughter Erika to the mutated genetic structure, so that some of the creature is composed of Erika as well. He names the plant 






Biollante





.


Meanwhile, Bio-Major anonymously sends a letter to the 

Diet of Japan
, informing Japan's government that they have planted several bombs inside Mt. Mihara, Godzilla's current prison. If the anti-nuclear bacteria is not handed over, the company threatens to detonate the bombs and release Godzilla. With the entire country held hostage, the government is forced to comply. The trade-off with the remaining thief goes well until the Saradian agent (the assassin) shows up, killing the thief before stealing the ANB. The thief dies before he can show Lieutenant Goro Gondo (T ru Minegishi) and Dr. Kazuhito Kirishima (Kunihiko Mitamura) how to deactivate the explosives, which are set on a timer. The bombs go off, Mt. Mihara erupts, and the mighty Godzilla is free once again.


Upon hearing Godzilla's roar, Biollante's blossom opens, and the plant monster begins calling out to Godzilla. Dr. Shiragami theorizes that this is because both Godzilla and Biollante are essentially the same being. With Godzilla's destination made clear, the JSDF prepare their strategies for dealing with the indestructible monster. The  

Super X-II
 , a remote controlled and stronger version of the first  

Super X
 , is deployed, and though at first seems effective in combating Godzilla, is eventually overwhelmed by Godzilla's atomic breath, and is forced to retreat.


Godzilla reaches Biollante. A huge battle ensues, and briefly it appears that there is a stalemate. However, Godzilla's atomic breath has an adverse effect on the composition of Biollante's cells, and the plant monster begins to disintegrate from exposure to the attack. With Biollante apparently dead, Godzilla continues on.


By now, the JSDF is ready, with the young Major Sho Koruki (Masanobu Takashima) in charge of operations. It is theorized that Godzilla, running low on radioactive energy after its fights with the Super X-II and Biollante, will head towards the nearest operational nuclear reactor, which is located in Tsuruga, on the other side of the country. All of Japan's military is sent out to meet Godzilla at Iso Bay.


Unexpectedly, Godzilla surfaces in Osaka bay, avoiding a confrontation with the JSDF. Saegusa tries to help, attempting to make Godzilla turn away from Osaka. Her efforts distract Godzilla momentarily, but the force of Godzilla's will and his physic brainpower, being infinately beyond Saegusa's, overwhelms the young psychic, and she faints. A plan is put into action, involving infecting Godzilla with the regained ANB, which Dr. Shiragami helped develop. In its final battle the Super X-II is destroyed by Godzilla after luring it into Osaka's business District. Here a division of soldiers, including Lieutenant Gondo, carrying rocket launchers equipped with the ANB awaits the monster. The operation is initially successful, despite the death of Lieutenant Gondo, with ANB injected into Godzilla at three different points, including his mouth. Godzilla is unaffected by the germs, and continues on.


The failure of the bacteria to work is attributed to Godzilla's low body temperature, which keeps the bacteria in a near-dormant state. If Godzilla can be heated, Shiragami theorizes, then the ANB should work. The JSDF develops another plan: lure Godzilla onto a field of microwave-emitting plates during an artificial thunderstorm, where it will be heated by the microwaves.


The operation begins, but it seems that Godzilla isn't affected by the microwaves as he crushes plate after plate beneath his feet. Just as everything seems lost, a low rumble is heard and Biollante's spores rain down from the sky. Suddenly a larger more Godzilla-like Biollante emerges from the ground. After destroying all nearby land forces, Biollante attacks Godzilla, and the two massive monsters fight to the death with Godzilla winning the battle. Suddenly, however, Godzilla begins to wobble and, losing its balance, falls headfirst into the ocean. With the intense battle raising its body temperature, the ANB inside of Godzilla became active. With Godzilla temporarly knocked out, the fatally wounded Biollante succumbs to her injuries and dies, disintegrating and once again, firing her spores into space. As the monster's remains float upwards, Dr. Shiragami sees the image of his daughter among the spores. Calling out to her, he walks forward and gets shot and killed in the back by the Saradian agent, who is still after Godzilla's cells. Dr. Kirishima chases the agent and fights him. The agent is at a disadvantage until he is able to grab his weapon again. Unarmed, Kirishima awaits certain death as the agent, from atop an inactive microwave plate, takes aim. Suddenly the agent disintegrates and Major Koruki removes his finger from the button that activated the plate.


With everything resolved, the characters take a moment to reflect and relax, when a dark form rises from the water. It is Godzilla, whose body temperature has been lowered by the cool sea water. With the ANB inactive again, Godzilla is healthy again, albeit restricted to the ocean. Seemingly content with this, Godzilla turns and heads for deeper waters.


The body of Dr. Shiragami is placed inside a tent, with his superior briefly mourning him before leaving. Erika is heard to comment on the events of the film, and the film concludes with a shot of Godzilla swimming away.




Box Office


In Japan, the film sold approximately 2 million tickets, earning $7,000,000.




Trivia



This film was the winner of a contest posed by Toho. The concept was created Shinichiro Kobayashi, a dentist. His script was widely different from the final film, the few parts that remained were Erika's death, Biollante's creation, a psychic girl, and for the most part, the ending. This first draft also had Dr. Shiragami first create a rat/fish hybrid monster named Deutalios who was quickly killed by Godzilla. This was cut and replaced by Godzilla's battles with Biollante's rose stage and Super X-II. 
In another ending, Biollante sacrifices herself to defeat Godzilla by turning into a wave of pure energy.




DVD Releases


There are currently no stated plans to release Godzilla vs. Biollante on Region 1 

DVD
 from 
Miramax Home Entertainment. 


Toho has released the film several times on DVD in Japan, but as a Region 2 release and without English subtitles.


There was a Region 3 release by Universe Laser   Video co. as a budget title alongside 

Godzilla 1985
. It contains Japanese and Cantonese Audio but includes English subtitles.




External links





  
   vs      (Gojira tai Biorante)  (in Japanese).   

Japanese Movie Database
. Retrieved on 
2007-07-19.


 
Godzilla vs. Biollante  at the 

Internet Movie Database



 
Godzilla vs. Biollante'' at 

Allmovie



 
Godzilla vs. Biollante'' at 

Rotten Tomatoes











The 
Godzilla franchise






Original film



Godzilla
 (1954) /  

Godzilla, King of the Monsters!
 (1956)







Sh wa series



Godzilla Raids Again
 (1955)    

King Kong vs. Godzilla
 (1962)    

Mothra vs. Godzilla
 (1964)    

Ghidorah, the Three-Headed Monster
 (1964)    

Invasion of Astro-Monster
 (1965)    

Godzilla vs. the Sea Monster
 (1966)    

Son of Godzilla
 (1967)    

Destroy All Monsters
 (1968)    

All Monsters Attack
 (1969)    

Godzilla vs. Hedorah
 (1971)    

Godzilla vs. Gigan
 (1972)    

Godzilla vs. Megalon
 (1973)    

Godzilla vs. Mechagodzilla
 (1974)    

Terror of Mechagodzilla
 (1975)







Heisei series



The Return of Godzilla
 (1984)    

Godzilla vs. Biollante
 (1989)    

Godzilla vs. King Ghidorah
 (1991)    

Godzilla vs. Mothra
 (1992)    

Godzilla vs. Mechagodzilla II
 (1993)    

Godzilla vs. SpaceGodzilla
 (1994)    

Godzilla vs. Destoroyah
 (1995)







Millennium series



Godzilla 2000
 (1999)    

Godzilla vs. Megaguirus
 (2000)     (2001)    

Godzilla Against Mechagodzilla
 (2002)     (2003)     (2004)






Related films and 
Media tie-ins



Atragon
    

Battle in Outer Space
    

Dogora
    








Comic Books







    

Frankenstein Conquers the World
    

Godzilla
 (1998)    
Godzilla 3D to the MAX    












Godzilla Island











    

The Godzilla Power Hour
        

Gorath
    

King Kong Escapes
    









Monster Planet of Godzilla








    

Mothra
    

The Mysterians
    

Rebirth of Mothra
    

Rebirth of Mothra II
    

Rebirth of Mothra III
    

Rodan
    

Space Amoeba
    

Varan the Unbelievable
    

The War in Space
    

War of the Gargantuas
    





Video Games




    














Zone Fighter













''






the Main Monsters





Godzilla


    


Anguirus

    





Baragon




    






Biollante





   


Gorosaurus

    


Jet Jaguar

   


Kamoebas

   


Godzilla Jr

    







King Caesar






    









Manda








     


Minilla

    












Moguera











    





Mothra




    


Rodan

    
Varan    


Zilla








the Villains














King Ghidorah











   


Mechagodzilla

    


Destoroyah

    


Ebirah

    
Frankenstein   


Battra

    


Gabara

    







Ganime






    



Gezora


    


Gigan

   












Mechani-Kong











   





Megalon




    


Titanosaurus

    
SpaceGodzilla    


Megaguirus

   


Orga

   



Hedorah


    


Kumonga

    


Kamacuras

   


Krystalak

    




Obsidius










Related topics


Alien races    
Fictional locations    







Gotengo






    


Miki Saegusa

    
Monsterland and Monster Island   
Powers and abilities of Godzilla    


Steve Martin

    

Super X
    





Godzilla in popular culture


















</doc>

<doc><docno>15000</docno>







Insulin-like growth factor
15000

233698150
2008-08-23T08:07:02Z

TXiKiBoT
3171782



Cell signaling
Growth factors
endocrinology
Peptide hormones
Signal transduction







ILGF



The insulin-like growth factors (IGFs) are 
polypeptides with high 
sequence similarity to 
insulin. IGFs are part of a complex system that cells use to communicate with their 
physiologic environment.  This complex system (often referred to as the IGF  axis ) consists of two 
cell-surface receptors (IGF1R and IGF2R), two 
ligands (IGF-1 and IGF-2), a family of six high-affinity IGF binding 
proteins (IGFBP 1-6), as well as associated IGFBP degrading 
enzymes, referred to collectively as 
proteases.


IGF1/GH Axis



The IGF  axis  is also commonly referred to as the Growth Hormone/IGF1 Axis. 






Insulin-like growth factor 1





 (IGF-1) is mainly secreted by the liver as a result of stimulation by 
growth hormone (GH). IGF-1 is important for both the regulation of normal physiology, as well as a number of pathological states, including 
cancer.  The IGF axis has been shown to play roles in the promotion of 
cell proliferation and the inhibition of 
cell death (
apoptosis). 






Insulin-like growth factor 2





 (IGF-2) is thought to be a primary 
growth factor required for early development while 
IGF-I expression is required for achieving maximal growth. 



Gene knockout


 studies in mice have confirmed this, though other animals are likely to regulate the expression of these genes in distinct ways. While IGF-2 may be primarily 
fetal in action it is also essential for development and function of organs such as the 
brain, 
liver and 
kidney.


Factors that are known to cause variation in the levels of GH and IGF-1 in the circulation include an individuals genetic make-up, the time of day, their age, sex, exercise status, stress levels, genetics, nutrition level and body mass index (BMI), disease state, race, estrogen status and 
xenobiotic intake




IGF Targets



Almost every 
cell in the human body is affected by 
IGF-1, especially cells in 
muscle, 
cartilage, 
bone, liver, kidney, 
nerves, 
skin, and 
lungs. In addition to the insulin-like effects, 
IGF-1 can also regulate 
cell growth and development, especially in nerve cells, as well as cellular 
DNA synthesis. 


IGF-2 is secreted by the brain, kidney, 
pancreas and muscle in 
mammals. It is more specific in action than 
IGF-1. In adult humans it is found at 600 times the concentration of insulin.




IGF Receptors



Further work is required to determine the main 
receptors used by these growth factors to elicit their effects. The IGF's are known to bind the 
IGF-1 receptor, the 
insulin receptor, the IGF-2 receptor, the insulin-related receptor and possible other receptors.  The 
IGF-1 receptor seems to be the  physiologic  receptor -  
IGF-1 binds to it at significantly higher affinity than it binds the insulin receptor.  Like the insulin receptor, the IGF-1 receptor is a 
receptor tyrosine kinase - meaning the receptor signals by causing the addition of a phosphate molecule on particular tyrosines. The IGF-2 receptor only binds IGF-2 and acts as a  clearance receptor  - it activates no intracellular signalling pathways, functioning only as an IGF-2 sequestering agent and preventing IGF-2 signalling.




IGF Binding Proteins



IGF-1 and IGF-2 are regulated by a family of proteins known as the 
IGF-Binding Proteins.  These proteins help to modulate IGF action in complex ways that involve both inhibiting IGF action by preventing binding to the IGF-1 receptor as well as promoting IGF action possibly through aiding in delivery to the receptor and increasing IGF half-life.  Currently, there are 6 characterized IGF Binding Proteins (IGFBP1-6).  There is currently significant data suggesting that IGFBPs play important roles in addition to their ability to regulate IGFs.




Diseases affected by IGF



Studies of recent interest show that the Insulin/IGF axis play an important role in 
aging2. 
Nematodes, 
fruit-flies and other organisms have an increased life span when the gene equivalent to the mammalian insulin is 



knocked out


.  It is somewhat difficult to relate this finding to the mammal, however, because in the smaller organism there are many genes (at least 37 in the nematode 1) that are  insulin-like  or  IGF-1-like , whereas in the mammals insulin-like proteins comprise only 7 members (
insulin, 
IGFs, 
relaxins, 
EPIL, and 
relaxin-like factor)  and have apparently distinct roles with some but relatively less crosstalk.  On the other hand, simpler organisms typically have fewer receptors (only 1 known in the nematode)2, and the roles of these other insulins are unknown.  Furthermore these animals do not have specialized organs (
islets of Langerhans) which sense insulin in response to glucose homeostasis. Therefore it is an open question as to whether either IGF1 or insulin in the mammal may perturb aging, although there is strong suggestion dietary restriction phenomena are related.


Other studies are beginning to uncover the important role the IGFs play in diseases such as 
cancer and 
diabetes, showing for instance that IGF-1 stimulates growth of both prostate and breast cancer cells.  Researchers are not in complete agreement about the degree of cancer risk that IGF-1 poses.




See also












Insulin-like growth factor 1















Insulin-like growth factor 2









Growth hormone treatment



HGH controversies






References





 Cohen, Pinchas, et al.  
Insulin-like growth factors (IGFs), IGF receptors, and IGF-binding proteins in primary cultures of prostate epithelial . Journal of Clinical Endocrinology and Metabolism, Vol. 73, No. 2, 1991, pp. 401-07


 F. Yaghmaie, O. Saeed, S.A. Garan, M.A. Voelker, A.M. Gouw, W. Freitag, H. Sternberg and P.S. Timiras  
Age-dependent loss of insulin-like growth factor-1 receptor immunoreactive cells in the supraoptic hypothalamus is reduced in calorically restricted mice . International Journal of Developmental Neuroscience, Vol. 24, Issue 7, 2006, pp. 431-436


 Lippman, Marc E.  The development of biological therapies for breast cancer . Science, Vol. 259, 
January 29 
1993, pp. 631-32


 Papa, Vincenzo, et al.  Insulin-like growth factor-I receptors are overexpressed and predict a low risk in human breast cancer . Cancer Research, Vol. 53, 1993, pp. 3736-40


 Scarth, J  Modulation of the Growth Hormone-Insulin-Like Growth Factor (GH-IGF) axis by pharmaceutical, nutraceutical and environmental xenobiotics: an emerging role for xenobiotic metabolizing enzymes and the transcription factors regulating their expression. A review. . Xenobiotica, Vol. 36, (2-3) pp. 119-218


 Woods, Alisa G. 
increases in hippocampal insulin-like growth factor-1 messenger RNA expression are severely attenuated in middle aged and aged rats.  Neuroscience, Vol. 83, (3) pp. 663-668






Pierce, et al. Genes and Development 2001

ibid.












Endocrine system: 
hormones/
endocrine glands (
Peptide hormones, 
Steroid hormones)






Hypothalamic-pituitary

 
Hypothalamus: 
TRH, 






CRH





 , 
GnRH, 






GHRH





, 
somatostatin, 
dopamine -  
Posterior pituitary: 
vasopressin, 
oxytocin -  
Anterior pituitary: 
  (
FSH, 
LH, 
TSH), 
GH, 
prolactin, 
POMC (
ACTH, 
MSH, 
endorphins, 
lipotropin)







Adrenal axis

 
Adrenal medulla: 
epinephrine, 
norepinephrine -  
Adrenal cortex:  
aldosterone, 
cortisol, 
DHEA







Thyroid axis

 
Thyroid: 
thyroid hormone (
T3 and 
T4) - 
calcitonin -  
Parathyroid: 
PTH







Gonadal axis


Testis: 
testosterone, 
AMH, 
inhibin -  
Ovary: 
estradiol,  
progesterone, 
inhibin/
activin, 
relaxin(pregnancy)






Other end. glands

 
Pancreas: 
glucagon, 
insulin, 
somatostatin  -  
Pineal gland: 
melatonin






Non-end. glands

 
Placenta: 
hCG, 
HPL, 
estrogen, 
progesterone -  
Kidney: 
renin, 
EPO, 
calcitriol, 
prostaglandin -  
Heart atrium: 






ANP





 -  
Stomach: 
gastrin, 
ghrelin -  
Duodenum:  
CCK, 
GIP, 
secretin, 
motilin, 
VIP -  
Ileum:  
enteroglucagon -   
Adipose tissue: 
leptin, 
adiponectin, 
resistin - 
Thymus: 
Thymosin - 
Thymopoietin - 
Thymulin - 
Skeleton: 
Osteocalcin - 
Liver/other: 






Insulin-like growth factor





 (






IGF-1





, 






IGF-2





)






Target-derived


NGF, 






BDNF





, 
NT-3
















Growth factors







Fibroblast


FGF receptor ligands: 
1 (acidic)/
2 (basic)/
5    
3/
4/
6    
7/
10/
22    
8/
17/
18    
9/
16/
20

FGF homologous factors: 
11    
12    
13    
14


hormone-like: 
19    
21    
23





















EGF-like domain















TGF     
Epidermal     
Heparin-binding EGF-like







TGF  pathway


TGF  (
1, 
2, 
3)













Insulin-like














1





    






2













Platelet-derived


A    
B    
C    
D







Vascular endothelial


A    
B    
C    
D    
PGF






Other


Nerve    
Hepatocyte






see also ''











 External links 













</doc>

<doc><docno>18000</docno>








Latin conjugation
18000

242263643
2008-10-01T15:22:11Z

Hairy Dude
274535



Latin language
Verbs by language





Conjugation is the creation of derived forms of a 
verb from its basic forms or 
principal parts. It may be affected by 
person, 
number, 
gender, 
tense, 
mood, 
voice or other language-specific factors. When, for example, we use a verb to function as the action done by a subject, most 
languages require conjugating the verb to reflect that meaning. (For more information on conjugation in general, see the article on 
grammatical conjugation.)

In 
Latin, there are four main patterns of conjugation composed of groups of verbs that are conjugated following similar patterns. As in other languages, Latin verbs have a 
passive voice and an 
active voice. Furthermore, there exist 
deponent and semi-deponent Latin verbs (verbs with a passive form but active meaning), as well as 
defective verbs (verbs with a perfect form but present meaning). Sometimes the verbs of the third declension with a root on - , are regarded as a separate pattern of conjugation, and are called the fifth conjugation, so that it is said there are five main patterns of conjugation.


In a 
dictionary, Latin verbs are always listed with four principal parts which allow the reader to deduce the other conjugated forms of the verbs. These are:



 the first person 
singular of the 
present indicative active


 the 
present 
infinitive


 the first person singular of the 
perfect indicative active


 the 
supine or, in some texts, the perfect passive participle, which is nearly always identical.  Texts that commonly list the perfect passive participle use the future active participle for intransitive verbs. Some verbs lack this principal part altogether.




For simple verb paradigms, see the following pages: 
http://en.wiktionary.org/wiki/Appendix:Latin_first_conjugation, 
http://en.wiktionary.org/wiki/Appendix:Latin_second_conjugation, 
http://en.wiktionary.org/wiki/Appendix:Latin_third_conjugation, 
http://en.wiktionary.org/wiki/Appendix:Latin_fourth_conjugation



Latin verb properties


Latin verbs have the following properties.




1. Two 
aspects perfective (finished), imperfective (unfinished)

:2. Two 
voices active, passive


3. Three finite 
moods indicative, subjunctive, imperative

:4. Four non-finite forms infinitive, gerund, participle, supine


5. Six  
tenses 

::



Present

 
Perfect




Imperfect

 
Pluperfect




Future

 
Future Perfect





6. Two 
numbers singular, plural

:7. Three 
persons first, second, third




The four conjugations


There exist four important systems of verb inflection. These are the four conjugations.



The first conjugation


The first conjugation is characterized by the 
vowel   and can be recognized by the - re ending of the present active infinitive. The principal parts usually adhere to the following patterns.



perfect with  v ''


port , port re, port v , port tum   to carry, bring


am , am re, am v , am tum   to love, be fond of


   All regular first conjugation verbs follow this pattern.   


perfect with  u ''


sec , sec re, secu , sectum   to cut, divide


fric , fric re, fricu , frictum   to rub


vet , vet re, vetu , vetitum   to forbid, prohibit


perfect with    and stem vowel lengthening


lav , lav re, l v , lautum   to wash, bathe


iuv , iuv re, i v , i tum   to help, assist


reduplicated perfect


st , st re, stet , statum   to stand


d , dare, ded , datum   to give, bestow 







irregular













The second conjugation


The second conjugation is characterized by the vowel  , and can be recognized by the -e  ending of the first person present indicative and the - re ending of the present active infinitive.



perfect with  u ''


terre , terr re, terru , territus   to frighten, deter


doce , doc re, docu , doctus   to teach, instruct


tene , ten re, tenu , tentus   to hold, keep


   All regular second conjugation verbs follow this pattern.   


perfect with  v ''


d le , d l re, d l v , d l tus   to destroy, efface


cie , ci re, c v , citum   to arouse, stir


perfect with  s  and  x ''


auge , aug re, aux , auctus   to increase, enlarge


iube , iub re, iuss , iussus   to order, bid


reduplicated perfect with   ''


morde , mord re, momord , morsum   to bite, nip


sponde , spond re, spopond , sp nsum   to vow, promise


perfect with    and vowel lengthening


vide , vid re, v d , v sus   to see, notice


fove , fov re, f v , f tus   to caress, cherish


perfect with    only


str de , str dere, str d    to hiss, creak


ferve , ferv re, ferv 1   to boil, seethe


1may be fervu .




The third conjugation


The third conjugation is characterized by a short thematic vowel, which alternates between e, i, and u in different environments. Verbs of this conjugation end in an  ere in the present active infinitive. There is no one regular rule for constructing the perfect stem of third-conjugation verbs, but the following patterns are used.



perfect with  s  and  x ''


carp , carpere, carps , carptum   to pluck, select


trah , trahere, tr x , tr ctum   to drag, draw


ger , gerere, gess , gestum   to wear, bear


flect , flectere, flex , flexum   to bend, twist


reduplicated perfect with   ''


curr , currere, cucurr , cursum   to run, race


caed , caedere, cec d , caesum   to kill, slay


tang , tangere, tetig , t ctum   to touch, hit


pell , pellere, pepul , pulsum   to beat, drive away


perfect with -v ''


pet , petere, pet v , pet tum   to seek, attack


lin , linere, l v , l tum   to smear, befoul


ser , serere, s v , satum   to sow, plant


ter , terere, tr v , tr tum   to rub, wear out


stern , sternere, str v , str tum   to spread, stretch out


perfect with    and vowel lengthening


ag , agere,  g ,  ctum   to do, drive


leg , legere, l g , l ctum   to collect, read


em , emere,  m ,  mptum   to buy, purchase


vinc , vincere, v c , victum   to conquer, master


fund , fundere, f d , f sum   to pour, utter


perfect with    only


 c ,  cere,  c ,  ctum   to strike, smite


vert , vertere, vert , versum   to turn, alter


v s , visere, v s , v sum   to visit


perfect with  u ''


met , metere, messu , messum   to reap, harvest


vom , vomere, vomu , vomitum   to vomit


col , colere, colu , cultum   to cultivate, till


tex , texere, texu , textum   to weave, plait


gign , gignere, genu , genitum   to beget, cause


present stem with a  u''


minu , minuere, minu , min tum   to lessen, diminish


ru , ruere, ru , rutum   to collapse, hurl down


stru , struere, str x , str ctum   to build, erect


verbs with  sc ''


n sc , n scere, n v , n tum   to investigate, learn


adol sc , adol scere, adol v    to grow up, mature


fl r sc , fl r scere, fl ru    to begin flourish, blossom


haer sc , haer scere, haes , haesum   to adhere, stick


p sc , p scere, p v , p stum   to feed, nourish




Intermediate between the third and fourth conjugation are the 
third-conjugation  i  verbs, discussed below.




The fourth conjugation


The fourth conjugation is characterized by the vowel   and can be recognized by the - re ending of the present active infinitive. The fourth conjugation verbs' principal parts generally adhere to the following patterns.



perfect with  v ''


audi , aud re, aud v , aud tus, a, um   to hear, listen (to)


muni , mun re, mun v , mun tus, a, um   to fortify, build


   All regular fourth conjugation verbs follow this pattern. 


perfect with  u ''


aperi , aper re, aperu , apertum   to open, uncover


perfect with  s  and  x ''


saepi , saep re, saeps , saeptum   to surround, enclose


sanci , sanc re, s nx , s nctum   to confirm, ratify


senti , sent re, s ns , s nsum   to feel, perceive


perfect with    and vowel lengthening


veni , ven re, v n , ventum   to come, arrive







Personal endings


Personal endings are used in all tenses. The present, imperfect, future, pluperfect and future perfect tenses use the same personal endings in the active voice. However, the pluperfect and future perfect do not have personal endings in the passive voice. The perfect tense uses its own personal endings in the active voice.






Active

Passive



Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



Familiar

First Person

 , m

mus

or, r

mur



Second Person

s

tis

ris (re)

min 



Third Person

t

nt

tur

ntur




Active




Singular

Plural



Perfect

First Person

 

imus



Second Person

ist 

istis



Third Person

it

 runt ( re)







Imperfective aspect tenses


The tenses of the imperfective aspect, which are the present, imperfect and future tenses, express an action that hasn't been completed. The verbs for explanation are:




1st Conjugation: port , port re, port v , port tum   to carry, bring

:2nd Conjugation: terre , terr re, terru , territum   to frighten, deter


3rd Conjugation: pet , petere, pet v , pet tum   to seek, attack

:4th Conjugation: audi , aud re, aud v , aud tum   to hear, listen (to)


For the all conjugations, the  re is removed from the second principal part. For example, from port re, port  is formed. This is the present stem, and it is used for all of the tenses in the imperfective aspect. Occasionally, the terminating vowel of the stem is lengthened and/or shortened, and sometimes completely changed. This is especially so in the third conjugation and most conjugations in the subjunctive mood.



Present tense


The present tense (Latin tempus praes ns) is used to show an uncompleted action which happens in the current time. The present tense does not have a tense sign. Instead, the personal endings are added to the bare present stem. However, in this tense the thematical vowel, most notably the   in the third conjugation, changes the most frequently.



Indicative present


The indicative present expresses general truths, facts, demands and desires. Most commonly, a verb like port  can be translated as  I carry,   I do carry,  or  I am carrying. 



In all but the third conjugation, the thematical vowel of the stem is only used. In the third conjugation, the e is only used in the second person singular in the passive for a less difficult pronunciation. Otherwise, it becomes either an i or u.


The first person singular of the indicative active present is the first principal part. All end in   .






Indicative Active Present



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



First Person

port 

port mus

terre 

terr mus

pet 

petimus

audi 

aud mus



Second Person

port s

port tis

terr s

terr tis

petis

petitis

aud s

aud tis



Third Person

portat

portant

terret

terrent

petit

petunt

audit

audiunt





Add the passive endings to form the passive voice. The passive portor can be translated as  I am carried,  or  I am being carried. 




Indicative Passive Present



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



First Person

portor

port mur

terreor

terr mur

petor

petimur

audior

aud mur



Second Person

port ris

port min 

terr ris

terr min 

peteris

petimin 

aud ris

aud min 



Third Person

port tur

portantur

terr tur

terrentur

petitur

petuntur

aud tur

audiuntur



Notice that the second person singular for petere is peteris instead of the supposed petiris.




Subjunctive present


The subjunctive present may be used to assert many things. In general, in independent sentences, it is translated 



hortatorily


 (only in the third person plural), 
jussively and 
optatively. Portem can be translated as  Let me carry.  or  May I carry.  Port mus can be  Let us carry. 


Some alterations have occurred in the vowels from the indicative and subjunctive.



The first conjugation now uses an e and an  .


The second conjugation uses ea and e .


In the third conjugation all thematicals have become either a or  .


The fourth conjugation now has either ia or i .




 We eat caviar  is a helpful mnemonic for remembering this.  1st conjugation verbs have an  e  in their stem (we), 2nd conjugation verbs have an  -ea  (eat), third conjugation verbs have an  a  (caviar), and fourths have an  ia  (caviar). Other acceptable mnemonics include she reads a diary, he beats a liar, everybody eats apple iambics, or let's steal a fiat.




Subjunctive Active Present



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



First Person

portem

port mus

terream

terre mus

petam

pet mus

audiam

audi mus



Second Person

port s

port tis

terre s

terre tis

pet s

pet tis

audi s

audi tis



Third Person

portet

portent

terreat

terreant

petat

petant

audiat

audiant





Like the indicative, active personal endings may be replaced by passive personal endings. Porter can be translated as  Let me be carried  or  May I be carried.  Hortatorily, Port mur can be  Let us be carried. 






Subjunctive Passive Present



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



First Person

porter

port mur

terrear

terre mur

petar

pet mur

audiar

audi mur



Second Person

port ris

port min 

terre ris

terre min 

pet ris

pet min 

audi ris

audi min 



Third Person

port tur

portentur

terre tur

terreantur

pet tur

petantur

audi tur

audiantur







Imperative present


The imperative in the present conveys commands, pleas and recommendations. Port  can be translated as  Carry you.  or simply,  Carry.  The imperative present only occurs in the second person.



The second person singular in the active voice only uses the bare stem, and doesn't add an imperative ending.






Imperative Active Present



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



Second Person

port 

port te

terr 

terr te

pete

petite

aud 

aud te





The imperative present of the passive voice is rarely used. Port min  can be translated as  Be carried you.  or  Be carried. 



The singular uses the present active infinitive, and the plural uses the present passive indicative form of the second person plural.








Imperative Passive Present



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



Second Person

port re

port min 

terr re

terr min 

petere

petimin 

aud re

aud min 








Imperfect tense


The imperfect tense (Latin tempus imperfectum) indicates a perpetual, but incomplete action in the past. It is recognized by the tense signs b  and b  in the indicative, and re and r  in the subjunctive.



Indicative imperfect


In the indicative mood, the imperfect simply express an action in the past that was not completed. Port bam can be translated to mean  I was carrying,   I kept carrying,  or  I used to carry. 



In the indicative, the imperfect employs its tense signs ba and b  before personal endings are added.






Indicative Active Imperfect



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



First Person

port bam

port b mus

terr bam

terr b mus

pet bam

pet b mus

audi bam

audi b mus



Second Person

port b s

port b tis

terr b s

terr b tis

pet b s

pet b tis

audi b s

audi b tis



Third Person

port bat

port bant

terr bat

terr bant

pet bat

pet bant

audi bat

audi bant





As with the present tense, active personal endings are taken off, and passive personal endings are put in their place. Port bar can be translated as  I was being carried,   I kept being carried,  or  I used to be carried. 






Indicative Passive Imperfect



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



First Person

port bar

port b mur

terr bar

terr b mur

pet bar

pet b mur

audi bar

audi b mur



Second Person

port b ris

port b min 

terr b ris

terr bamin 

pet b ris

pet b min 

audi b ris

audi b min 



Third Person

port b tur

port bantur

terr b tur

terr bantur

pet b tur

pet bantur

audi b tur

audi bantur







Subjunctive imperfect


In the subjunctive, the imperfect tense is quite important, especially in subordinate clauses. Independently, it is largely translated conditionally. Port rem can mean  I should carry,  or  I would carry. 



Unlike the indicative, the subjunctive doesn't modify the thematic vowel. The third conjugation's thematical remains short as an e, and the fourth conjugation doesn't use an i  before the imperfect signs. It keeps its  .


In the subjunctive, the imperfect employs its tense signs re and r  before personal endings.


The verbs esse (to be) has two subjunctive imperfects: one using the present infinitive (essem, esses, esset, essemus, essetis, essent) and one using the future infinitive (forem, fores, foret, foremus, foretis, forent).






Subjunctive Active Imperfect



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



First Person

port rem

port r mus

terr rem

terr r mus

peterem

peter mus

aud rem

aud r mus



Second Person

port r s

port r tis

terr r s

terr r tis

peter s

peter tis

aud r s

aud r tis



Third Person

port ret

port rent

terr ret

terr rent

peteret

peterent

aud ret

aud rent





As with the indicative subjunctive, active endings are removed, and passive endings are added. Port rer may be translated as  I should be carried,  or  I would be carried. 




Subjunctive Passive Imperfect



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



First Person

port rer

port r mur

terr rer

terr r mur

peterer

peter mur

aud rer

aud r mur



Second Person

port r ris

port r min 

terr r ris

terr r min 

peter ris

peter min 

aud r ris

aud r min 



Third Person

port r tur

port rentur

terr r tur

terr rentur

peter tur

peterentur

aud r tur

aud rentur








Future tense


The future tense (Latin tempus fut rum simplex) expresses an uncompleted action in the future. It is recognized by its tense signs b , bi, bu, e and   in the indicative and the vowel   in the imperative mood.



Indicative future


The future tense always refers to an incomplete action. Also, the future tense is more strict in usage temporally in Latin than it is in English. Standing alone, port b  can mean  I shall carry,  or  I will carry.  Remember that  shall  and  will  are only used in the first person. All other persons only use  will  in the indicative.



The first and second conjugations use b , bi and bu as signs for the future indicative.


The third and fourth conjugations replace their thematicals with a,   and  . The fourth conjugation inserts an   before the a, e and  .






Indicative Active Future



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



First Person

port b 

port bimus

terr b 

terr bimus

petam

pet mus

audiam

audi mus



Second Person

port bis

port bitis

terr bis

terr bitis

pet s

pet tis

audi s

audi tis



Third Person

port bit

port bunt

terr bit

terr bunt

petet

petent

audiet

audient





As with all imperfective system tenses, active personal endings are removed, and passive personal endings are put on. Port bor translates as  I shall be carried. 






Indicative Passive Future



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



First Person

port bor

port bimur

terr bor

terr bimur

petar

pet mur

audiar

audi mur



Second Person

port beris

port bimin 

terr beris

terr bimin 

pet ris

pet min 

audi ris

audi min 



Third Person

port bitur

port buntur

terr bitur

terr buntur

pet tur

petentur

audi tur

audientur



Notice that the second person singular for port re and terr re are port beris and terr biris instead of the supposed port biris and terr beris. The former inflections are used to ease pronunciation.




Imperative future


The so-called future imperative was an archaic and formal form of the imperative; by the classical period it was chiefly used in legal documents and the like. A few irregular or defective verbs (esse 'be', meminisse 'remember') used this form as their only imperative. 


Port t  can be translated as  You shall carry .



As mentioned previously, the vowel   is used as a sign of the future imperative.






Imperative Active Future



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



Second Person

port t 

port t te

terr t 

terr t te

petit 

petit te

aud t 

aud t te



Third Person

port t 

portant 

terr t 

terrent 

petit 

petunt 

aud t 

audiunt 





The letter R is used to designate the passive voice in the future imperative. The second person plural is absent here. Port tor translates as  You shall be carried. 




Imperative Passive Future



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



Second Person

port tor

  

terr tor

  

petitor

  

aud tor

  



Third Person

port tor

portantor

terr tor

terrentor

petitor

petuntor

aud tor

audiuntor









Perfective aspect tenses


The tenses of the perfective aspect, which are the perfect, pluperfect and future perfect tenses, are used to express actions that have been completed. The verbs used for explanation are.




1st Conjugation: port , port re, port v , port tum   to carry, bring

:2nd Conjugation: terre , terr re, terru , territum   to frighten, deter


3rd Conjugation: pet , petere, pet v , pet tum   to seek, attack

:4th Conjugation: audi , aud re, aud v , aud tum   to hear, listen (to)


For all conjugations, the    is removed from the third principal part. For example, from port v , port v is formed. This is the perfect stem, and it is used for all of the tenses in the perfective aspect. The perfective aspect verbs also use the perfect passive participle in the passive voice. See 
below to see how it is formed. Along with these participles, the verb esse, which means  to be , is used.


Unlike the imperfective aspect, inflection does not deviate from conjugation to conjugation.



Perfect tense


The perfect tense (Latin tempus perfectum) refers to an action completed in the past. Tense signs are only used in this tense with the indicative. The tense signs of the subjunctive are eri and er .



Indicative perfect


The indicative perfect expresses a finished action in the past. If the action wasn't finished, but still lies in the past, one would use the imperfect tense. Port v  is translated as  I carried,   I did carry,  or  I have carried. 



As aforementioned, the indicative present in the active voice has its special personal endings.






Indicative Active Perfect



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



First Person

port v 

port vimus

terru 

terruimus

pet v 

pet vimus

aud v 

aud vimus



Second Person

port vist 

port vistis

terruist 

terruistis

pet vist 

pet vistis

aud vist 

aud vistis



Third Person

port vit

port v runt

terruit

terru runt

pet vit

pet v runt

aud vit

aud v runt





In the passive voice, the perfect passive participle is used with the auxiliary verb esse. It uses the indicative present form of esse. Port tus sum translates as  I was carried,  or  I have been carried. 




Indicative Passive Perfect



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



First Person

port tus sum

port t  sumus

territus sum

territ  sumus

pet tus sum

pet t  sumus

aud tus sum

aud t  sumus



Second Person

port tus es

port t  estis

territus es

territ  estis

pet tus es

pet t  estis

aud tus es

aud t  estis



Third Person

port tus est

port t  sunt

territus est

territ  sunt

pet tus est

pet t  sunt

aud tus est

aud t  sunt







Subjunctive perfect


Like the subjunctive imperfect, the subjunctive perfect is largely used in subordinate clauses. Independently, it is usually translated as the potential subjunctive. By itself, port verim translates as  I may have carried. 



The tense signs eri and er  are used before the personal endings are added.






Subjunctive Active Perfect



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



First Person

port verim

port ver mus

terruerim

terruer mus

pet verim

pet ver mus

aud verim

aud ver mus



Second Person

port ver s

port ver tis

terruer s

terruer tis

pet ver s

pet ver tis

aud ver s

aud ver tis



Third Person

port verit

port verint

terruerit

terruerint

pet verit

pet verint

aud verit

aud verint





The passive voice uses the perfect passive participle with the subjunctive present forms of esse. Port tus sim means  I may have been carried. 




Subjunctive Passive Perfect



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



First Person

port tus sim

port t  s mus

territus sim

territ  s mus

pet tus sim

pet t  s mus

aud tus sim

aud t  s mus



Second Person

port tus s s

port t  s tis

territus s s

territ  s tis

pet tus s s

pet t  s tis

aud tus s s

aud t  s tis



Third Person

port tus sit

port t  sint

territus sit

territ  sint

pet tus sit

pet t  sint

aud tus sit

aud t  sint








Pluperfect tense


The pluperfect tense (Latin tempus pl s quam perfectum) expresses an action which was completed before another completed action. It is recognized by the tense signs era and er  in the indicative and isse and iss  in the subjunctive.



Indicative pluperfect


As with English, in Latin, the indicative pluperfect is used to assert an action which was completed before another (perfect tense). Port veram translates as  I had carried. 



The tense sign er  is employed before adding the personal endings, with the long   following the usual rules for shortening before final -m, -t, and -nt.






Indicative Active Pluperfect



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



First Person

port veram

port ver mus

terrueram

terruer mus

pet veram

pet ver mus

aud veram

aud ver mus



Second Person

port ver s

port ver tis

terruer s

terrurer tis

pet ver s

pet ver tis

aud ver s

aud ver tis



Third Person

port verat

port verant

terruerat

terruerant

pet verat

pet verant

aud verat

aud verant





In the passive voice, the present passive participle is utilized with esse in the indicative imperfect. Port tus eram is translated as  I had been carried. 




Indicative Passive Pluperfect



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



First Person

port tus eram

port t  er mus

territus eram

territ  er mus

pet tus eram

pet t  er mus

aud tus eram

aud t  er mus



Second Person

port tus er s

port t  er tis

territus er s

territ  er tis

pet tus er s

pet t  er tis

aud tus er s

aud t  er tis



Third Person

port tus erat

port t  erant

territus erat

territ  erant

pet tus erat

pet t  erant

aud tus erat

aud t  erant







Subjunctive pluperfect


The subjunctive pluperfect is to the subjunctive perfect as the subjunctive imperfect is to the subjunctive present. Simply put, it is used with the subjunctive perfect in subordinate clauses. Like the subjunctive imperfect, it is translated conditionally independently. Port vissem is translated as  I should have carried,  or  I would have carried. 



The tense signs isse and iss  are used before the personal endings.






Subjunctive Active Pluperfect



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



First Person

port vissem

port viss mus

terruissem

terruiss mus

pet vissem

pet viss mus

aud vissem

aud viss mus



Second Person

port viss s

port viss tis

terruiss s

terruiss tis

pet viss s

pet viss tis

aud viss s

aud viss tis



Third Person

port visset

port vissent

terruisset

terruissent

pet visset

pet vissent

aud visset

aud vissent





As always, the passive voice voice uses the perfect passive participle. The subjunctive imperfect of esse is used here. Port tus essem may mean  I should have been carried,  or  I could have been carried,  in the conditional sense.




Subjunctive Passive Pluperfect



port re

terr re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



First Person

port tus essem

port t  ess mus

territus essem

territ  ess mus



Second Person

port tus ess s

port t  ess tis

territus ess s

territ  ess tis



Third Person

port tus esset

port t  essent

territus esset

territ  essent




petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



First Person

pet tus essem

pet t  ess mus

aud tus essem

aud t  ess mus



Second Person

pet tus ess s

pet t  ess tis

aud tus ess s

aud t  ess tis



Third Person

pet tus esset

pet t  essent

aud tus esset

aud t  essent








Future perfect tense


The least used of all the tenses, the future perfect tense (Latin tempus fut rum ex ctum) conveys an action that will have been completed before another action. It is signified by the tense signs er  and eri. The future perfect tense is the only tense that occurs in a single mood.



Indicative future perfect


As said, the future perfect is used to mention an action that will have been completed in futurity before another action. It is often used with the future tense. In simple translation, port ver  means  I will have carried,  or  I shall have carried. 



The tense signs er  and eri are used before the personal endings.






Indicative Active Future Perfect



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



First Person

port ver 

port verimus

terruer 

terruerimus

pet ver 

pet verimus

aud ver 

aud verimus



Second Person

port veris

port veritis

terrueris

terrueritis

pet veris

pet veritis

aud veris

aud veritis



Third Person

port verit

port verint

terruerit

terruerint

pet verit

pet verint

aud verit

aud verint





As with all perfective aspect tenses, the perfect passive participle is used in the passive voice. However, the future perfect uses the indicative future of esse as the auxiliary verb. Port tus er  is  I will have been carried,  or  I shall have been carried. 




Indicative Passive Future Perfect



port re

terr re

petere

aud re




Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural

Singular

Plural



First Person

port tus er 

port t  erimus

territus er 

territ  erimus

pet tus er 

pet t  erimus

aud tus er 

aud t  erimus



Second Person

port tus eris

port t  eritis

territus eris

territ  eritis

pet tus eris

pet t  eritis

aud tus eris

aud t  eritis



Third Person

port tus erit

port t  erunt

territus erit

territ  erunt

pet tus erit

pet t  erunt

aud tus erit

aud t  erunt









Non-finite forms


The non-finite forms of verbs are participles, infinitives, supines, gerunds and gerundives. The verbs used are:




1st Conjugation: port , port re, port v , port tum   to carry, bring

:2nd Conjugation: terre , terr re. terru , territum   to frighten, deter


3rd Conjugation: pet , petere, pet v , pet tum   to seek, attack

:4th Conjugation: audi , aud re, aud v , aud tum   to hear, listen (to)



The participles





See also: 
Participle


There are three participles: present active, perfect passive and future active.



The present active participle is declined like a 
third declension adjective with one ending.


In the first and second conjugations, the present active infinitive is formed by taking the present stem and adding an  ns. The genitive singular form adds an  ntis, and the thematicals   and   are shortened.


In the third conjugation, the e of the present stem is lengthened. In the genitive, the   is short again.


In the fourth conjugation, the   is shortened, and an   is placed. Of course, this   is short in the genitive.


Puer port ns translates into  carrying boy. 


The perfect passive participle is declined like a 
first and second declension adjective.


In all conjugations, the perfect participle is formed by taking the  um from the supine, and adding a  us (masculine nominative singular).


Puer port tus translates into  carried boy. 


The future active participle is declined like a 
first and second declension adjective.


In all conjugations the  um is removed from the supine, and an   rus (masculine nominative singular) is added.


Puer port t rus translates into  boy about to carry,  or  boy who is about to carry. 






Participles



port re

terr re

petere

aud re



Present Active

port ns,  antis

terr ns,  entis

pet ns,  entis

audi ns,  entis



Perfect Passive

port tus,  a,  um

territus,  a,  um

pet tus,  a,  um

aud tus,  a,  um



Future Active

port t rus,  a,  um

territ rus,  a,  um

pet t rus,  a,  um

aud t rus,  a,  um







The infinitives





See also: 
Infinitive


There are six infinitives. They are in the present active, present passive, perfect active, perfect passive, future active and future passive.



The present active infinitive is the second principal part (in regular verbs).


Port re means  to carry. 


The present passive infinitive is formed by adding a  r  to the present stem. This is only so for the first, second and fourth conjugations. In the third conjugation, the thematical vowel, e, is taken from the present stem, and an   .


Port r  translates into  to be carried. 


The perfect active infinitive is formed by adding an  isse onto the perfect stem.


Port visse translates into  to have carried. 


The perfect passive infinitive uses the perfect passive participle along with the auxiliary verb esse. The perfect passive infinitive must agree with what it is describing in number and gender.


Port tus esse means  to have been carried. 


The future active infinitive uses the future active participle with the auxiliary verb esse.''


Port t rus esse means  to be going to carry.  The future active infinitive must agree with what it is describing in number and gender.


Esse has two future infinitives: futurus esse and fore.


The future passive infinitive uses the supine with the auxiliary verb  r .


Port tum  r  is translated as  to be going to be carried.  This is normally used in indirect speech. For example: Omn s sen t res d x runt templum conditum  r .  All the senators said that a temple would be built. 






Infinitives



port re

terr re

petere

aud re



Present Active

port re

terr re

petere

aud re



Present Passive

port r 

terr r 

pet 

aud r 



Perfect Active

port visse

terruisse

pet visse

aud visse



Perfect Passive

port tus esse

territus esse

pet tus esse

aud tus esse



Future Active

port t rus esse

territ rus esse

pet t rus esse

aud t rus esse



Future Passive

port tum  r 

territum  r 

pet tum  r 

aud tum  r 


Here, masculine endings are used.






The supine





See also: 
Supine


The supine is the fourth principal part. It resembles a masculine noun of the 
fourth declension. Supines only occur in the accusative and ablative cases.



The accusative form ends in a  um, and is used with a verb of motion show the purpose. Thus, it is only used with verbs like cedere, ven re, etc. The accusative form of a supine can also take an object if needed.


Pater v nit 'port tum l ber s su s.   The father came to carry his children.


The ablative, which ends in a   , is used with the Ablative of Specification.


Arma haec facillima 'port t  erant.   These arms were the easiest to carry.






Supine



port re

terr re

petere

aud re



Accusative

port tum

territum

pet tum

aud tum



Ablative

port t 

territ 

pet t 

aud t 







The gerund





See also: 
Gerund


The gerund is formed similarly to the present active participle. However, the  ns becomes an  ndus, and the preceding   or   is shortened. Gerunds are neuter nouns of the 
second declension, but the nominative case is not present. The gerund is a noun, meaning  the act of doing (the verb) .



Portand  can mean  of carrying.  Portand  (dative) can mean  to carrying.  Portandum can simply mean  carrying.  Portand  (ablative) can mean  by carrying,   in respect to carrying,  etc.






Gerund



port re

terr re

petere

aud re



Genitive

portand 

terrend 

petend 

audiend 



Dative

portand 

terrend 

petend 

audiend 



Accusative

portandum

terrendum

petendum

audiendum



Ablative

portand 

terrend 

petend 

audiend 



Locative

portand 

terrend 

petend 

audiend 





The preposition ad can be used with a gerund in the accusative singular case to indicate purpose. For example, ad oppugnandum is translated as  to attack . However, when an object is introduced, Romans usually converted the gerund to a gerundive, agreeing with the accusative object. For example,  to attack the enemy  would become ad hostes oppugnandos, which, while technically grammatically wrong, was the normal way of using this construction. The gerundive is said to be  attracted  into the case of the noun, and occurred because Romans (mistakenly) thought that the gerund(ive) and the object should be in the same case.




The gerundive





See also: 
Gerundive


The gerundive is the passive equivalent of the gerund, and much more common in Latin. 
It is a first and second declension adjective, and means  [the act of] (the verb) being done . Often, the gerundive is used with an implicit
esse, to show obligation. 





Puer portandus means  (the) boy should be carried,  or  (the) boy who should be carried.  Amanda means  She who must be loved .





Gerundive



port re

terr re

petere

aud re



portandus,  a,  um

terrendus,  a,  um

petendus,  a,  um

audiendus,  a,  um








Periphrastic conjugations


There are two 
periphrastic conjugations. One is active, and the other is passive. 



Active


The first periphrastic conjugation uses the future participle. It is combined with the forms of esse. It is translated as  I am going to carry,   I was going to carry , etc.






Conjugation

Translation



Pres. Ind.

port t rus sum''

I am going to carry



Imp. Ind.

port t rus eram''

I was going to carry



Fut. Ind.

port t rus er ''

I will be going to carry



Perf. Ind.

port t rus fu ''

I have been going to carry



Plup. Ind.

port t rus fueram''

I had been going to carry



Fut. Perf. Ind.

port t rus fuer ''

I will have been going to carry



Pres. Subj.

port t rus sim''

I may be going to carry



Imp. Subj.

port t rus essem''

I should be going to carry



Perf. Subj.

port t rus fuerim''

I may have been going to carry



Plup. Subj.

port t rus fuissem''

I should have been going to carry







Passive


The second periphrastic conjugation uses the gerundive. It is combined with the forms of esse. It is translated as  I am to be carried,   I was to be carried , etc.




Conjugation

Translation



Pres. Ind.

portandus sum''

I am to be carried



Imp. Ind.

portandus eram''

I was to be carried



Fut. Ind.

portandus er ''

I will deserve to be carried



Perf. Ind.

portandus fu ''

I was to be carried



Plup. Ind.

portandus fueram''

I had deserved to be carried



Fut. Perf. Ind.

portandus fuer ''

I will have deserved to be carried



Pres. Subj.

portandus sim''

I may deserve to be carried



Imp. Subj.

portandus essem''

I should deserve to be carried



Perf. Subj.

portandus fuerim''

I may have deserved to be carried



Plup. Subj.

portandus fuissem''

I should have deserved to be carried



Pres. Inf.

portandus esse''

To deserve to be carried



Perf. Inf.

portandus fuisse''

To have deserved to be carried








Peculiarities within conjugation and non-finite forms



Irregular verbs


There are a few irregular verbs in Latin that aren't grouped into a particular conjugation (such as esse and posse), or deviate slightly from a conjugation (such as ferre,  re, and dare). It consists of the following list and their compounds (such as conferre). Many irregular verbs lack a fourth principal part.




sum, , fu , fut rus   to be, exist

:possum, 
http://localhost:18088/wiki/index.php/Latin_conjugation#endnote_potesse, potu    to be able, can


e , ,  v  /   ,  tum   to go

:vol , , volu    to wish, want


n l , , n lu    to be unwilling, refuse

:m l , , m lu    to prefer


fer , , tul , l tum   to bear, endure

:fi , , factus sum   to become, happen


ed , ,  d ,  sum   to eat, waste

:d , , datum   to give, bestow




Deponent and semi-deponent verbs










Deponent verb






s are verbs that are passive in form (that is, conjugated as though in the 
passive voice) but active in meaning.  These verbs have only three principal parts, since the perfect tenses of ordinary passives are formed 
periphrastically with the perfect participle, which is formed on the same stem as the supine. Some example coming from all conjugations are:




1st Conjugation: m ror, , m r tus sum   to admire, wonder

:2nd Conjugation: polliceor, , pollicitus sum   to promise, offer


3rd Conjugation: loquor, , loc tus sum   to speak, say

:4th Conjugation: orior, , ortus sum   to rise, spring up


Deponent verbs use active conjugations for tenses that do not exist in the passive: the 
gerund, the 
supine, the present and 
future participles and the future infinitive. They cannot be used in the passive themselves, and their analogues with  active  form do not in fact exist: one cannot directly translate  The word is said  with any form of loqu , and there are no forms like loqu , loquis, loquit, etc.


Semi-deponent verbs form their impefective aspect tenses in the manner of ordinary active verbs; but their perfect tenses are built periphrastically like deponents and ordinary passives; thus semideponent verbs have a perfect active participle instead of a perfect passive participle. An example:




aude , aud re, ausus sum   to dare, venture


Note: In the 

Romance languages
, which lack deponent or passive verb forms, the Classical Latin deponent verbs either disappeared (being replaced with non-deponent verbs of a similar meaning) or changed to a non-deponent form. For example, in Spanish and Italian, m r r  changed to mirar(e) by changing all the verb forms to the previously nonexistent  active form , and aude  changed to osar(e) by taking the participle ausus and making an -ar(e) verb out of it (note that au went to o).




Third conjugation  i  verbs

 
There is a rather prolific subset of important verbs within the third conjugation. They have an  i  present in the first principal part ( ior for deponents), and resemble the fourth conjugation in some forms. Otherwise, they are still conjugated as normal, third conjugation verbs. Thus, these verbs are called third conjugation  i  verbs or third conjugation i-stems. Some examples are:




capi , capere, c p , captum   to take, seize

:rapi , rapere, rapu , raptum   to plunder, take up


faci , facere, f c , factum   to do, make

:cupi , cupere, cup v , cup tum   to desire, long for


morior, mor 
http://localhost:18088/wiki/index.php/Latin_conjugation#endnote_moriri, mortuus sum (dep.)   to die, decay

:patior, pat , passus sum (dep.)   to suffer, undergo


They resemble the fourth conjugation in the following instances.




Indicative present (first person singular, third person plural)   capi , capiunt, etc.

:Indicative imperfect   capi bam, capi b mus, etc.


Indicative future   capiam, capi mus, etc.

:Subjunctive present   capiam, capi mus, etc.


Imperative future (third person plural)   cupiunt , etc.

:Present Active Participle   capi ns,  entis


Gerund   capiend , capiendum, etc.

:Gerundive   capiendus,  a,  um




Defective verbs


Defective verbs are verbs that are only conjugated in only some instances. 



Some verbs are only conjugated in the perfective aspect's tenses, yet have the imperfective aspect's tenses' meanings. As such, the perfect becomes the present, the pluperfect becomes the imperfect, and the future perfect becomes the future. So, the defective verb  d  means  I hate.  These defective verbs' principal parts are given in vocabulary with the indicative perfect in the first person and the perfect active infinitive. Some examples are:






 d ,  disse   to hate

::memin , meminisse   to remember


coep , coepisse   to have begun

*A few verbs, which meanings usually have to do with speech, only appear in certain occurrences.




Cedo (plur. cette), which means  Hand it over!  or  Out with it!  is only in the imperative mood, and only is used in the second person.


The following are conjugated irregularly.



 i    I affirm, state




| class= wikitable 

|-
!rowspan= 3 |
!colspan= 8 | Conjugation of  i 
|-
!colspan= 2 | IndicativePresent
!colspan= 2 | IndicativeImperfect
!colspan= 2 | SubjunctivePresent
|-
|-
! Singular || Plural || Singular || Plural || Singular || Plural
|-
! First Person
|  i  ||    ||  i bam ||  i b mus ||    ||   
|-
! Second Person
| a s ||    ||  i b s ||  i b tis ||  ias ||   
|-
! Third Person
| a t ||  iunt ||  i bat ||  i bant ||  iat ||   
|}




Present Active Participle:    i ns,  entis






inquam   I say




| class= wikitable 

|-
!rowspan= 3 |
!colspan= 6 | Conjugation of inquam
|-
!colspan= 2 | IndicativePresent
!colspan= 2 | IndicativeFuture
!colspan= 2 | IndicativePerfect
!colspan= 2 | IndicativeImperfect
|-
|-
! Singular || Plural || Singular || Plural || Singular || Plural || Singular || Plural
|-
! First Person
| inquam || inquimus1 ||    ||    || inquii2 ||    ||    ||   
|-
! Second Person
| inquis ||    || inqui s || inquisti3 ||    ||    ||    ||   
|-
! Third Person
| inquit || inquiunt || inquiet ||    || inquit ||    || inquiebat
http://localhost:18088/wiki/index.php/Latin_conjugation#endnote_inquiebat ||   
|}




f r    to speak




| class= wikitable 

|-
!rowspan= 3 |
!colspan= 10 | Conjugation of f r 
|-
!colspan= 2 | IndicativePresent
!colspan= 2 | IndicativeFuture
!colspan= 2 | IndicativePerfect
!colspan= 2 | IndicativePluperfect
!colspan= 2 | ImperativePresent
|-
|-
! Singular || Plural || Singular || Plural || Singular || Plural || Singular || Plural || Singular || Plural
|-
! First Person
| for ||    || f bor ||    || f tus sum ||    || f tus eram ||    ||    ||   
|-
! Second Person
|    ||    ||    ||    ||    ||    ||    ||    || f re ||   
|-
! Third Person
| f tur || fantur || f bitur ||    ||    ||    ||    ||    ||    ||   
|}




Imperative - fare
:Present Active Participle   f ns, fantis


Present Active Infinitive   f r 

:Present Passive Infinitive - farier


Supine   (acc.) f tum, (abl.) f t 

:Gerund   (gen.) fand , (dat. and abl.) fand , no accusative


Gerundive   fandus,  a,  um


The Romance languages lost many of these verbs, but others (such as  d  and the imperative cedo) survived but became regular fully-conjugated verbs (in Italian, odiare, cedere). 





Impersonal verbs


Impersonal verbs are those lacking a person. In English impersonal verbs are usually used with the neuter pronoun  it  (as in  It seems,  or  It storms ). Latin uses the third person singular. These verbs lack a fourth principal part. A few examples are:




pluit, pluere, pluvit   to rain (it rains)

:ningit, ningere, ninxit
http://localhost:18088/wiki/index.php/Latin_conjugation#endnote_ningunt   to snow (it snows)


oportet, oport re, oportuit   to be proper (it is proper, one should/ought to)


The third person forms of esse may also be impersonal:




Nox aest va calida fuit.   It was a hot, summer night.

:Est e  qu  terram colunt.   It is they who till the land.




Irregular future active participles


As stated, the future active participle is normally formed by removing the  um from the supine, and  adding a   rus. However, some deviations occur.





presentactiveinfinitive

supine

futureactiveparticiple



iuv re''

i tum ''

iuv t rus''



lav re''

lautum''

lav t rus''



parere''

partum''

parit rus''



ruere''

rutum''

ruit rus''



sec re''

sectum''

sec t rus''



fru ''

fructum''

fruit rus''



 mor 
http://localhost:18088/wiki/index.php/Latin_conjugation#endnote_moriri

mortuum''

morit rus''



or r ''

ortum''

orit rus''







Alternate verb forms


Several verb forms may occur in alternate forms (in some authors these forms are fairly common, if not more common than the canonical ones):



The ending  ris in the passive voice may be  re as in:


port b ris   port b re''


The ending   runt in the perfect tense may be   re as in:


port v runt   port v re''






Syncopated verb forms


Like most Romance languages, syncopated forms and 
contractions are present in Latin. They may occur in the following instances.



Perfect stems that end in a  v may be contracted when inflected.


port visse   port sse''


port vist    port st ''


port verant   port rant''


port visset   port sset''


The compounds of noscere (to learn) and mov re (to move, dislodge) are also able to be contracted.


novist    nost ''


novistis   nostis''


commoveram   commoram''


commover s   commor s''







Summary of forms



The four conjugations in the indicative mood






The Four Conjugations, Indicative Mood



1st

2nd

3rd

3rd (i-stem)

4th



laud , laud re, laud v , laud tum

terre , terr re, terru , territum

ag , agere,  g , actum

capi , capere, c p , captum

audi , aud re, aud v , aud tum



Active

Passive

Active

Passive

Active

Passive

Active

Passive

Active

Passive



Present



1st Singular 

laud 

laudor

terr o

terreor

ag 

agor

capi 

capior

audi 

audior



2nd Person

laud s

laud ris

terr s

terr ris

agis

ageris

capis

caperis

aud s

aud ris (aud re)



3rd Person

laudat

laud tur

terret

terr tur

agit

agitur

capit

capitur

audit

aud tur



1st Plural 

laud mus

laud mur

terr mus

terr mur

agimus

agimur

capimus

capimur

aud mus

aud mur



2nd Person

laud tis

laud min 

terr tis

terr min 

agitis

agimin 

capitis

capimin 

aud tis

aud min 



3rd Person

laudant

laudantur

terrent

terrentur

agunt

aguntur

capiunt

capiuntur

audiunt

audiuntur



Imperfect








Notes



^ The archaic uncontracted form potesse occurs frequently in 










Lucretius









.

^  Form moriri, 



Ovid


, 
Metamorphoses (poem) 14.215 
http://www.thelatinlibrary.com/ovid/ovid.met14.shtml

^  Used by 
Cicero frequently.

^  Used personally by 










Lucretius









 (2.627): ningunt 
http://www.thelatinlibrary.com/lucretius/lucretius2.shtml




References




















Horace













, 





Sermonum liber primus




 1.3.66
http://www.thelatinlibrary.com/horace/serm1.shtml



Catullus
, 10.27
http://www.thelatinlibrary.com/catullus.shtml


Cicero, 





De Oratore




 2.259
http://www.thelatinlibrary.com/cicero/oratore2.shtml#64





 
New Latin Grammar, an eBook, originally written by 





Charles Edwin Bennett




 at the 

Project Gutenberg







See also





 
Grammatical conjugation


 
Latin declension


 
List of English words from Latin verb forms


 

Romance copula



 









William Whitaker's Words











 

Latin mnemonics







External links






Wiktionary



For a list of words relating to Latin verbs, see the  in 

Wiktionary
, the free dictionary





 
Verbix automatically conjugates verbs in Latin.


 
Latin Verb Synopsis Drill tests a user on his ability to conjugate verbs correctly.














</doc>

